See and hear insights about the creative process behind designing for, about and with food. The discussion — on the convergence of creativity and cuisine in KC — will range from photography to writing, from packaging design to branding, and from developing new flavors to collaborative partnerships.
Things’ve been hella busy over here at UWEA headquarters, between the continuing success of Harvest Noon Café, the stress of all my schoolwork, and of course, all the bake-off victories. But I wanted to make sure to check in today to alert all you Torontonians to two awesome upcoming events that I’ll be at, with some awesome UWEA-approved food for sale!
But growing grains and cereals, and turning that into viable sustenance, wasn't as easy as walking down to the corner market. Making food was daily, back breaking work. Unlike today, early man - Man 1.0 if you like - was accomplished at using every last bit of everything he had. "Waste not want not" was a reality, not just a quaint phrase from olden days. The skill of farming begat the skill of brewing... probably quite by accident. Let's take a peak into the past to see what that first encounter with beer may have been like:
The laws that keep you from carrying your gun in bars or where ever mean nothing to your enemy. Your reluctance to shoot someone works to is advantage. His greater experience in street violence and the element of surprise is on his side.
Friday, 10:14 pm
If you are looking for SELD lesson plans and the resources to go with each lesson, check out this site by clicking here!
Then of course the white knobs! Love you Hobby Lobby and your half off knobs!
My film gear, tripod, lights and tapes, and DVDs of completed projects. As I plan to do some tutorials as part of my gift-making project currently underway, this needs to be accessible.
The whole description captures the tone and feel of the novel as well—and that’s what you want to achieve in your query pitches (even if you aren’t writing YA). Also note that it really doesn’t do much plot summarizing about the novel as a whole. It really just spotlights the main conflict (keeping her spy background a secret from the boy she likes).
That's why this new Underworld: Awakening (released next Friday-ish) looks good to me. After Melancholia and Rise of the Planet of the Apes it may be the first movie to wise up and root for the other side, to trust we're smart enough not to start biting people because we saw the protagonist instead of the villain do it in the movies, or that we'll hate humanity like we don't all ready.
There may never be a need to teach the clean/unclean foods in your special needs program or ministry. However, you may want to begin to consider the foods you are eating out of concern for your own health.
Andrew 1:39 minutes Ryan 2:35
And look who provides the endorsement on the front cover of Hell to Pay: why it's Dennis Lehane, who we'll be returning to for the next post in Lehane/Pelecanos Week. What are the odds?
Offering
The investor asked for $24,000 credit for the repairs, essentially making the offer $401,000. Countrywide said no dice.
In recent years it has become fashionable to think that the period of economic and productive ascendancy of the rich countries – chiefly consisting of western Europe, north America and Japan – is finished as more of the world’s manufacturing momentum switches to China and other fast growing nations. This view is nonsense.
And now Mr Gowlland is suspended, but the (acting) Archdeacon isn’t calling it so, and neither is the Bishop of Southwark. What is significant here is that the Lay Reader whose licence has been temporarily ‘withdrawn’ for two months supports the Coalition for Marriage, while the Lay Readers who oppose it - and who stood up in front of the congregation to dispute publicly with Mr Gowlland – are not subject to any disciplinary action. Of course, Lay Readers are not employees, and so the (acting) Archdeacon is not bound by employment legislation. But, as a courtesy, one might expect the Church of England to uphold certain procedures and principles which accord with natural justice: viz. i) oral warning; ii) written warning; iii) final written warning; iv) suspension/dismissal. This would accord with the teachings of Jesus (Mt 18:15) and of St Paul (Gal 6:1ff).
Oh, my bad, her name’s Xion…but she is a transgender (ha hah!)
AmyOops tagged me today.
Several other political films have went viral on the Internet in the past. The two biggest ones are Peter Joseph’s Zeitgeist, and Alex Jones’s The Obama Deception. Unlike the KONY 2012 film, those films were not funded by large foundations and did not promote militarization and state violence as solutions.
*Are you right-handed or left-handed? Left
There was a tasting room but Sherri didn’t stop and have a free Guinness. One of the things employees used to get with their jobs was a pint of Guinness each day with their lunch. There was a display of bottles and a plaque with the ingredients as well as old wooden vats that had been turned into souvenir shops.
TCI: OK, final question. What was the inspiration, besides the song name, for “The Pornographer” video? That seems incredibly, I don’t know how to frame it, ballsy move to fuck or pretend to fuck on camera for a song. I mean, it’s part of your band to always go to whatever extremes to convey the art and pop in your music. But...did you come up with the idea or the director?
During National Recovery Month in September, AETN channels – including A&E Network, History, Bio Channel, and the Crime & Investigation Network – will air a series of public service advertisements, highlighting the importance of treatment and the hope for recovery. Benjamin Bratt, Whoopi Goldberg, Russell Simmons and Christopher Lawford are among the celebrities featured in the campaign.
This one is by Allanah Hendry of Carnoustie High School, who won the first prize.
Unfortunately they are very expensive to take, their bows are only S3, they still have no armour and are just not that effective in game. They are basically a poor mans Way Watchers who are ironically over priced scouts...when it comes to our scout units unfortunately they just don't perform as well as we would like (more on Way Watchers later!).
He was also well known as a connoisseur of sports collectibles, and the foremost expert on the topic on the radio in Northeast Ohio. If a local sports enthusiast wanted to know if a piece of sports memorabilia was a "good item!", Sindelar was the first person to ask.
Free State Brewing Co. Old Backus Barleywine
2 Amy Shillig W Canyon Country, CA 8:09.1 25:19.56
How to play: You need to upload your project for this week's challenge to your online blog or public photo gallery. Leave a link that goes directly to your project in the Inlinkz form at the bottom of this post. If you upload to online galleries, please also use the keyword or tag, JUGS61. After you post to Inlinkz you can also leave a comment here.
The Inky Impressions Challenge this week is to use two different ribbons or trims on your card or paper project. We have a wonderful showing of Inkette inspiration for you over on the Inky challenge blog so be sure to pop on over there to take a look - and of course, play along!
● This product produces no air pollution. If at least 60% of the automobile
5. Pat the dough to 3/4-in thick. Using a biscuit cuttter or a glass dipped in flour, cut out biscuits. Place the biscuits, 2 in apart, on an ungreased baking sheet. Gather dough trimmings, pat to 3/4-in thick and cut out more biscuits.
I’ve provided a Spanish translation here because Peruvians, without fail, are vague in their most commonly asked question. Do they want to know where I biked from or where I am from? Nine times out of ten they want to know my nationality. Five times out of ten I’ll turn their curiosity into a subtle grammar lesson about the more correct “De donde eres?,” depending on how many times I’ve answered this question that day and how long it’s been since I’ve eaten. Normally, I simply repeat it outloud, rephrasing it in a grammatically correct way that would make my high school teacher proud: where am I from? (De donde soy?). This generally adds intellectual street cred to my already impressive Bob & Surly ride and, if I’m lucky, a small discount on my set meal price. Or at least a free refill before parting ways.
Now depending on the server, these items may not be worth the trouble. Check your AH to see how much Greater Planar Essence’s are selling for. If they are, say, 20g like they are on my server’s AH, buy out all 6 of these weapons and disenchant them. This is a ludicrous way of making an easy profit, as these weapons are cheap and can yield 2-4 GPE’s a piece.
The second project for these crates is something that was inspired from a photo I saw on pinterest. It was a message center covered in chalkboard paint. The original link is from Etsy. I love etsy, I get about as much inspiration from that site and the little etsy shops as I do from browsing around CraftGawker.
However, the only way for Christ to be able to indwell and have fellowship with all of his followers no matter where they happen to be is if he is omnipresent. Yet the only way for him to be omnipresent is if he is God since only God is omnipresent!
sliced fresh ginger (2" knob)
I think the team seems to finally understand how to play and we must accept that certain situations need a long ball while we still need to maintain possession for large chunks of the 90 minutes.
By the time many of you see this video, we will be on a plane, winging our way back across the Atlantic to our home in Washington, DC. While I'm sad that our Parisian adventure is over and cannot watch this video without welling up, my heart is filled with joy from the amazing experiences we've had and the many wonderful friends we've made.
Monday, May 16, 1983, I returned home from school, dropped my school books on the dresser as the doorbell rang. A young goodlooking guy with bright blue eyes, Kurt Cobain, smiled as I opened the door. Without a word he pointed to the old van parked at the top of my drive. The side door swung open and my mouth dropped as the lead singer in full stage costume exited. If the phone had not started ringing, distracting me, I might have been more concerned about how and why this man knew where I lived.
♥ ~ky
It stems from my desire to not only inspire, but to also help take people beyond inspiration towards perspiration and, ultimately, unto realization.
So tonight we had Joe's back to school conference. Like an open house / meet your teacher, only we had a scheduled time. We got to bring all of his stuff in and get it situated for when he starts school next week. We signed all of the emergency information, got his pin number for lunch (which he's keeping under lock and key because they told him he wasn't supposed to share it with anyone), and went to the book fair. Do you want to know the most impressive thing that happened during all of this? You'll never guess. I didn't cry. That's right. I held it together. For today anyway. :)
Tri-fold Paper Sleeve
But I also sent them to my agent, and he sent them on to a romantic-literature publisher I’m sure you’ve heard of. They published them. The third one comes out next week. I’m a phenomenon. They mention me alongside the greats: Cartland, Cookson, Collins.
When I started I knew nothing and realized I had A LOT to learn and I still do. But I love the medium of Royal Icing, I love how it flows and I love when I can get the ideas that swim in my mind onto a cookie or many of the cupcake toppers I make.
that might disturb her parents; make them
Well today Zoie is one year old! I cannot believe it has been a year since that cute little bundle of joy came into the world! I will take some pictures of her party today and share them tomorrow.
Fortunately neither one comes off anywhere near sappy. From start to finish, this is one inspired record.
Along side all this we have Amelie in the last book she was bitten by the master Draug and she is slowly turning into one of them and she is becoming very creepy and eww lol. at the end of the book I thought Oliver was finally gonna kill her but he doesn't and we finally get to see why.
Only a few lucky people can climb the corporate ladder, my friends. Like my man Flavor Flav said: Don't believe the Hype. We are all working bees. Yes, I do have my own studio, I do make my own rules, still, I am a worker bee just the same. If you are naive enough to believe that even if you start up your own business you will stop living in the ad cycle, you are mistaken. You would have to hit the jackpot so damn hard, you would need to dedicate years and years in order to have a chance to be a real boss.
I was crying out to God this week…begging Him to repair this lighthouse, pleading with Him to help me to keep shining out the beacon of hope to those that have been entrusted to me, when He gently reminded me that I am supposed to look to Him to be my lighthouse and that I am trying to do too much in my own strength.
VICTORY!But we wanted more.So Eminem was called for again!
I seriously could not be more proud of these kids! I was almost in tears congratulating them and telling them they did so good! Not only did they do a great job, they tried hard, had fun and are totally learning about healthy activities for now and in their future! It makes me even more proud of where I am now compared to a year ago. I would have really struggled to run a mile with them last year at this time...and to think not only did I do it, but I am teaching my kids something so important! Being healthy, being active and having FUN together!!!
This challenge started last year to celebrate my reaching the 200 follower mark. I had no idea that it would take off as well as it did in the short lead time I had in 2010. Nearly 100 bloggers participated last year with many more keeping up with the progress. In the end most of the participants were very satisfied with having been a part of the challenge.
When Work Friend A came back from the bathroom, she motioned us to leave. The expat turned his attention to her again. He didn’t show any sign of halting. He continued yakking and gabbing even though Work Friend A, who was then behind me, was not uttering any single word anymore. Not as a sign of defeat, mind you.
The divorce decree allows Abuhamda to move the children overseas, provided he has their mother’s permission. Abuhamda told The Associated Press in a phone interview from the Gaza Strip that he had her blessing, but Gonzales said that’s untrue and he deceived her.
Congrats Ladies! and thank you to all our fantastic players for joining us weekly! We love seeing your awesome creativity! There's still time to join this week's challenge... maybe you'll be one of our next Featured Friday player!!
Mister Man: Cool! So what were you going to name me if I had been born a boy?
Now I was going to do a regular WoW, and actually it was already scheduled to be posted. Just like my Pandemonium Review yesterday but for some reason Blogger just refuses to let my posts be posted (seriously considering switching to a new server...) Anyway to get my mind off of all this craziness I thought I would try something different and fun.
4. Your Story
As you can see now, there is an active Donation button to the right on our page. This takes you to a page that is hosted and sponsored by the GSF, and it is live. If you click it, you are not obligated to make a donation by that act alone, so feel free to explore. Though, if you have the cash, don't hold back either! Because if you do, and some have, you will be issued a receipt that you can use with the IRS at tax time.
-Angel
The final product is made from an old grey sweater and my sister’s junior high magenta sweatpants. I would never have known that sewing with knits requires special needles and settings, so I’m very glad I’d been reading about sewing for awhile before I attempted this! But with a quick switch of needles, this was actually really easy and the result looks professional. I love it!
Hi everyone! I hope you all had a great weekend. Mine was busy, but really really wonderful. Now that Monday has hit once again, I am sadly reminded of the many things I need to get done.
The Army set up service centres, hostels, adjacent to United States military camps. But Evangeline wanted to do more than serve military in the United States. “American boys are going to France,” she said. “We must go with them.”
This little man turned 1 years old this past week! My nephew is such a little stud muffin. And boy did he love his cake. (The pics are all out of order, sorry)
1 assorted
And...... sugar. Sweet sweet sugar.
Whhhat?? *insert Hank Hill’s shocked/appalled facial experession* I think there are many things wrong with this ad:
-I put a movie on for the twins.
Despite this, I found some things to be funny. For example:
In connection with the performances, an exhibition demonstrating the visuals, sounds and viruses of the world of Biophilia will be opened. It will run from October 10 to 28 in Harpa – Reykjavík Concert Hall. Educational programs for schoolchildren will also be linked to these performances.
So, yesterday made 11yrs that we have been together, we will have been married 10yrs on the 14th and I honestly wonder how we have stayed together this long...
We were leaving the Dr's office when I realized that I locked my keys in the car. We had to call Derek to come rescue us (how he got to spend his lunch break on his birthday). So, Jackson, Kira, and I were waiting in the Dr's waiting room.
Sometimes it’s best to follow your instincts and to believe in yourself to do the right thing. Paralysis by analysis is often the cause that many organisations cannot do well. It’s as Nike says, Just do it!
The doctor looks at them. “If he continues on like this he can will become anorexic.”
My blog is a mixture of my passions, desires and curiosities.
This one is hosted by {Indie}pendent Books. "I want to see pictures!!! And of course since I focus on indie books, I want to see them represented! What is an indie book? A book that has been published by a non-big-six publishing house. These big-six houses include Macmillan, Random House, Simon and Schuster, Penguin Group, Harper Collins, Hachette Book Group. Any other houses are eligible!"
Whether former Senior Police Inspector Rolando Mendoza was wrongfully accused of extortion or not is no longer the issue; rather his disregard for other people’s lives in selfish pursuit of justice.
The purple ribbon symbolizes many things….pancreatic cancer, domestic violence, religious tolerance, animal abuse, the victims of 9/11 including the police and firefighters, Crohn’s disease and colitis, cystic fibrosis, lupus, & fibromyalgia.
That’s when it hit me. I knew what had happened.
Gnostic Universe, Chart of the Heavens:
Anyways, other than that, I've basically just been in holiday party mode. Drinks and goodies for each. All the while slowly planning our Winter Wonderland New Year's eve bash. (this theme I find fitting, since a close friend of ours recently found out he got the job he interviewed for in Alaska, so he will be off to the cold lands come the end of January and our party with basically be one of the last get together he can make).
Le Bal Cafe is the scrumptious new English eatery attached to the equally new cultural space, Le Bal, just behind the bustling Place de Clichy in Paris' 17th arrondissement. On a quiet mews, just opposite a pretty little park, the popular Cafe is on the ground floor of the arts building and comes fully equipped for summer with its own cute little terrasse.
John Smith Hurt (1892 - 1966), better known as Mississippi John Hurt was an influential country-blues guitar player and singer. Raised in Avalon, Mississippi, John taught himself how to play guitar at the age of nine. His first recording sessions were in 1928 for Okeh Records, but after these were a commercial failure, he continues his work as a farmer. After a couple of his early recordings were released on Harry Smith's Anthology Of Folk Music, there was a interest in his music in the folk revival scene. When an Australian man found a recording of "Avalon Blues" there became an increased interest in finding Mississippi John Hurt himself. in 1963, folk musicologist Tom Hoskins, was able to locate Mississippi John Hurt in Avalon, Mississippi, using the lyrics to "Avalon Blues". While in Avalon, Tom Hoskins encouraged Mississippi John Hurt to move to Washinton D.C. and continue to perform. During the final years of his life, Mississippi John Hurt performed extensively, including a performance at 1964's Newport Folk Festival and recorded three albums for Vanguard records.
This is what CNN had to say about the show: “Commentators outside Russia have questioned the apparent link the show creates between Assange and the Kremlin, given RT's government-funded status.”
Jacquelyn Delaine Aldridge, 46, New York, N.Y.
The VLE is Blackboard (Bb), integrated with a student record system and fronted by a student portal. Plugged into Bb are Turnitin, Pebblepad (for portfolios e.g. online workbooks), Wikispaces, Adobe Connect (online seminars and presentation), mdxplay (an inhouse version of YouTube).
Many Tokelau people come and live in New Zealand, especial here in Auckland. They bring their flowery culture, especially their lava-lava.
Not too bad, isn’t it? Even if you really hate paper work you should now consider doing it.
I want to make love in the countryside on a warm spring day. Light afternoon rains can wash my sins off you and cleanse us both before we start again.
That being said we weren't trying either. I'm not keeping track of when I ovulate these days. I usually know within a few days because I'm fairly regular but I was apparently off.
With a little help from a pink chair, of course.
This is our new survey. But no need to vote. This is a biased poll. The results have been leaked to ABS-CBN even before they’re posted here.
Should you want to read Leviticus 15:5-27 you would find no less than thirteen occasions of washings or baptisms, in various form. Should the person fail to comply, he would be living in sin and disobedience.
Paper: Whisper White
Beige linen, grey cashmere, white cotton; I have a look in mind. An ‘Out of Africa’ business class look. But horrifyingly I am discovering that the top of me is a size 14 to16!! I didn’t bargain for this, I planned to look like Kate, Kate Moss, slim, skinny, rock n’ roll, not middle age and finding it hard to find ‘cool’ looks. What am I to do about this, diet? I have decided to cut out the gym; the shoulders that work for a cross channel swimmer are not working for me. No I must shrink down. I add liposuction to my ever growing list of surgery to become, as I told my therapist, the best I can become. Like hell! I want to look like KM. I am even considering taking up smoking; well after the surgery.
Each day, you can scroll down and find a different site to visit in lieu of mine. I promise not to disappoint. However I don't want to tell you much about each one. The best advice I ever heard about fixing someone up on a blind date - don't describe. Don't overpromise. Don't promise at all. Just let them discover. So that's what I'll do here.
“Then make me warm!”Junsu cut Yoochun off. “Make love to me.”
We're pretty sure that Will Feral, the wild cat that has been hanging around, is dead. We're sure that there is a yellow cat that has been hit by a car on the highway about a quarter mile away- we're just not sure it is Will. We were never able to get close enough to really get a good look. sigh... THAT is why we don't let our cats roam outside. Cars fly down that highway at highway+ speed and don't stop for anything.
My favourite memory was keeping all the windows and doors open in the house, putting the amps on max, strumming 5-6 chords in alteration and singing the cheesiest lyrics that even a Brie loving Frenchman would throw up. Two days later I would get approached by a neighbour telling me to “Shut the F#ck Up & play some Bon Jovi or Linkin Park“.
Hope to get round to see all yours.
The Christmas that came shortly after my eighth birthday brought a toy that would become one of my most used and favored possessions as a child; a globe. About that same time, my mother bought an Encyclopedia Britannica set and housed it in my bedroom in a bookcase made by my great grandfather. I would put hours of use into these two items as a child normally puts miles on a bicycle.
He refers to a series of the heroic adventures, starting in 2007 and culminating in August 2008 with thousands of British troops taking part in an operation to escort a 200-ton turbine to the Kajaki Dam on the Helmand River, 100 miles north-west of Kandahar City.
Which is why I think Nietzsche is completely wrong in using the phrase ‘slave revolt in morals’ to describe the spread of christianity. A real slave revolt doesn’t preserve and prolong the ideas and mentality of slavery: it does away with them. This is the systemic ambiguity in ‘slave-morality’: a morality created by slaves, or a morality created for slaves? Equivalently, does Christianity represent the triumph of the weak, the masses, the downtrodden – or does it represent the triumph of priests? The two are far from being the same.
For me, it is significant that New York is the birthplace of this movement. The 9/11 events in the Wall Street area in 2001 began one of the most intensive periods of Social, Political and Spiritual transformation in recent history. Now, ten years later, the Planet is Ready to enter into a new period of Transformation. But, this time, it will not be traumatic and violent, for the 11/11/11 energies are about Peace, Love and Renewal.
Bush, "And the idea of the hidden femininity in a man, and the man
I have no idea. Getting out of bed seemed like an achievement many days.
Read from my Mount TBR pile of doom
Here's a quick summary of how I made it:
The best part of self-publishing is being in control of the whole process and getting feedback from the paying public. And although I have a sales background, the marketing of something internet based is somewhat different to a physical book, and I am still learning. But then, I didn't set out to write something commercial, just something readable.
I made this last week and thought I'd share it since it went down so well in our house! This was one of my "put random things in a pan and hope for the best" meals and I'm happy to say that we all enjoyed it.
with toilets covered with shit and piss,
it had a cutting edge
Camryn, our blonde headed beauty, is the newest addition to our family. She was born on April 28th and was the first baby to be able to come home with mom!! She has brought so much joy into our home! In the early months she spent a lot of time hanging out with Dad at night so Mom could sleep. She smiles all the time, (except for the nights when she likes to keep her mom and dad up). She has beautiful big blue eyes with eyelashes that touch her eyebrows. She loves to watch her sister’s play and laughs at them quite often. She has started to roll around from one end of the room to the other. I can’t believe she is 7 months already! Her sisters absolutely adore her.
He’s starting up again, and we begin at 1-1. I know every enemy and its entire life story. I know every inch of this brick road, every patch of cloud in the clear blue sky. I know which pipes lead into the underbelly of the world and I’ve collected every dangling coin to be used nowhere and to buy nothing.
2) Don’t Let Him Sleep With You!!
___________
Godfathers Cause I said so UK
I know and you know that when I, or you and/or your friends say "I'm doing everything right and I'm not losing any weight" that it's bullshit. Whether we lie to ourselves or lie to others at one time or another we have probably exaggerated our real efforts. On the other hand there are times when you or I really are doing everything right and are not losing and THAT is some bullshit too! It is so frustrating.
I had them when I lived in the city (Albuquerque)
As for how his attitude is meant to be important to the overall storyline?
This is how you broke my heart and
carefree mind of a child
Inside is a 12 year old Piloto leaf.
I want to know if you play PES and what you like about it as well as what you hope the 2013 edition will be like. Please leave your thoughts and opinions in the comments section below.
So we got to see alot of action when we were going through our polar bear route.
b) the contents of our mind (our culture) recursively acts upon the umbworld constantly transforming it (i.e., nature), which in turn, transforms the contents of our mind (culture) which in turn transforms the umbworld (nature), and so on.
- $195 for butcher block (I had to get a larger size) from Ikea – looks like it’s even less now!
a very important period for me, I just wanted to do something
Puree contents of pot with immersion blender.
After winning the second title (3-0 against Pittsburg State; Elon had seven turnovers, but the Gorillas missed five field goals) Tolley walked away from coaching, but not from Elon, where he briefly became a fundraiser before taking a job at LabCorp (whose CEO was on the Elon board of trustees).
Stamps: 2-step Stampin' Thanks from the Heart, Abundant Hope
Other than that, I've been okay. Percocets are the painkiller of choice. Physical therapy starts Friday. Pain has been intermittent. However, it's been a bitch being in a sling for stuff like typing, writing up reports right-handed....and tonight I had the labor of transferring 5 gallons of beer from one vat to a glass carboy.
Yes, it is. Bravo to Pinterest for attempting to address copyright concerns by providing a snippet of code so that sites can "opt out". It doesn't entirely resolve the copyright issue, since one shouldn't have to "opt out" of a service you didn't join. How many of us, who sell our photos (I have 12,000 in my archives), have time to check the WWW to search for stolen images?
Now Darrell Issa himself, is charging that this ethics complaint is being orchestrated by the White House.
Spices can be added to the cake batter. Cinnamon, nutmeg, or whatever you want.
Well there ain’t nothin’ to this but your daughter/And the life you would not give her
Connie, the owner of Connie's Cafe (corner of Church Avenue and E. 5th Street), has graciously agreed to donate coffee and muffins for the volunteers.
Cut away the comfy taxpayer-provided safety nets protecting the phony captains of industry. A system that welds the escape hatches shut, forcing them to pay for their irresponsibility and malfeasance, will do more to tame the gamblers and pirates than the libraries full of regulations we now have.
I see somewhat of what you are saying, but then, I think this actually ends up working against your view. Here’s why: In looking at this again, it is clear grammatically, that “not made with hands”, “eternal” and “in the heavens” are all modifiers of the word “house”. So really, the inclusion of the comma is not a crucial difference. So basically, the most natural READING is that the house is going to be “not made with hands”, it is going to be “eternal” and it is going to be “in the heavens”. Even with a proleptic view here by Paul because of the present tense of “we have”, that doesn’t change the meaning of the modifying phrases, they still all mean what that house WILL be. “Not made with hands”, “eternal” and “in the heavens”. To read it any other way sets up a completely unnatural take on what Paul meant by “in the heavens” and does not match the other two phrases, ETERNAL and NOT MADE WITH HANDS, which will ALWAYS apply to the HOUSE.
When I doodle this is the shape I return to........
I noticed on lots of other food blogs that they will post a weekly menu, but don't do so until Sunday night or Monday morning. I shop on Saturday evenings or Sunday morning at the latest to prepare for the coming week, so seeing a yummy food on Monday that I don't want to wait a whole week for is just no fun! So, I present to you "Foodie Friday" where I will post on Friday of each week the menu for the coming week, with links to websites I pulled recipes from or if it's my own creation, a copy of the recipe. Once I have more time, I'll try to include pictures as well.
Happy Incoming and Outgoing to you all!!
When I was a child, we had several holidays at a guest house at Arnside. It operated on a ‘house-party’ basis, with a ‘host’ who arranged social activities during the day and informal entertainment in the evening. Often the same people came each year, and so we renewed friendships each summer. One summer, my parents acted as hosts for the week, and I felt very important when they let me give out quiz sheets, or when I was given a part to play in an evening concert.
Hmm, so help me understand this. Here we have a picture book about a bath. A dog. A cowboy. An extended joke about getting clean and its potential hazards for a habitual slob. I will point out that while admittedly, the cowboy has to take his clothes off to bathe (well, don't you?) there is nary a naked rear end visible in this book. Adam Rex has been cleverly circumspect in that matter. The laughs are all drawn from what we can't see.
Immediately after the Special Operations forces raids that killed bin Laden, a senior administration official who had an obvious interest in peddling a particular narrative about CIA interrogation techniques told reporters that the CIA interrogation of al-Qaeda detainees held at Guantanamo had been a critical factor in finally tracking down bin Laden. According to one version, Khalid Sheikh Mohammed, also known as "KSM," the mastermind of the 9/11 attack, had identified bin Laden's trusted courier in 2007; in another version, unidentified detainees had given interrogators the courier's real name.
humor, and an
Fusion Bolt
I love London. I’ve lived here most of my life and I never tire of it. I’m glad you think London had a character of its own, that was exactly what I was after.
I dreamed about spanking last night. It was only hours after I'd gotten a pretty thorough maintenance spanking. I have NEVER dreamed about it before, at least not that I remember.
On the pour the beer presents itself with a fantastic amber glow followed by an awesome foamy head which is not overly carbonated at all. Big fresh citrusy aroma on the nose with some hoppy pine thrown in too!
We never have any specific item we need to buy...
"I know," said his physician. "I can cure pneumonia."
The most exciting thing in her life right now, apart from Jesus, is that He’s letting her write her very first novel, and she’s almost done it. She loves poetry, and could get lost for weeks at a time in a good one.
Jason Heyward - another Brave! +2 pts
A little something more died, right then. Another little piece broke off inside somewhere, as I realized that even home wasn’t…home. Not really. Not anymore. Maybe not ever. I swore I wouldn’t cry. I swore I wouldn’t. But my eyes started to well up as I looked around my silent, empty house. I wiped my nose on the back of my sweatshirt sleeve, and swallowed the salty burn of my tears. I didn’t have time to cry. Not anymore. There were things to do.
Introverted Thinking: 7-11% (8.7%)
Cinders she's hot stuff art Norman Mansbridge.Very useful information thanks Kashgar
Why? Because I love good news, and thinking about news, and talking about news, and sharing good news, and having good news thrust upon me...
Yet the protests were similar to others in that they were organized, at least in part, by middle-class, secular intellectuals, many of whom started Facebook groups, wrote and gave interviews supporting the planned demonstrations.
You’re right…we can’t seem to believe it.
The oldest book I knew of back then on the history of Indian food was written by Abul Fazal (the book is called A’in-I Akbari) who was one of the nine ministers (9 jewels) in the emperor Akbar’s court. He was a historian and had documented recipes for the royal highness!! A royal dish had been created in their honour called navrattan khorma. Now, how do I know all this?
The first thing to do of course, is make a list of all the people you want to make gifts for... Be clear about the people on your list...these are people close to you and are a part of your life. For instance, I certainly wouldn't hand make corporate gifts for everybody that has something to do with my business...that's just mental....so be judicious in your choices!
I hardened my heart, determined to NOT repeat this mistake again…no, really…this time, I MEANT it.
4) “Hey, do you want some…” “No, I can’t eat that, I’ll die.” – Remember when you could eat food, and that’d be the end of it? You eat it. And you forget about it. Not anymore. My body can’t process certain foods anymore. Not only will my stomach hurt, but random other parts of my body will hurt too.
I have intentionally left the teeth imperfect. I have some plans for the messy spots later though there will be some sanding happening at some point...
Whisk the egg and cream together separately till just combined, and add it to the cashew-cheese mix.
After last week's experiments with chiffon cake, I thought to myself, what would chiffon cake taste like in cupcake form? So I decided to find out.
“Finally, the only person who can truly decide whether or not your work should be published is you. If like Billy or Graham, some friends and friends of friends have read your manuscript and given you positive feed-back, those comments might well be an indicator that your work is worth pursuing. If on the other hand their responses have been luke-warm at best, maybe your manuscript needs more work done to it, or possibly your talents lie in other areas other than writing.”
My background designer paper is from Stampin-Up’s garden green collection and I used some ruffled lucky limeade ribbon on the sentiment panel.
Krista has created the world, and the main characters and has invited writers to — well, come play. I urge you, writer or reader, or both, to go check it out as it continues to grow. And if you’re so inclined, pick up a pen and add to it. You’ll find all the pertinent info at the link above.
I pray for this morning’s Worship Celebrations. I pray that everything will work right this morning, and that we will not be hindered from worshiping you.
This handy “quick reference” manual gives you a quick tutorial on the new features of HTML5 — the newest version of HTML coding (though, it’s not yet official, yet).
No, that is not possible. Michael Pollock won’t be going in a minute. He has been speaking for an hour, and he is every bit as full of energy as he was the second I came in. He could go on for hours.
-and so on.
#3: Starting a business while employed by a potential competitor, or hiring employees without first checking their agreements with the current employer and their knowledge of trade secrets.
I came across this video on Foci's website. It's nicely done.
and I'll land under a car marked Lexus.
“Iraq’s oil auctions were portrayed as a model of transparency and a negotiating victory for the Iraqi government,” said Greg Muttitt, author of Fuel on the Fire: Oil and Politics in Occupied Iraq. “Now we see the reality was the opposite: a backroom deal that gave BP a stranglehold on the Iraqi economy, and even influence over the decisions of Opec.”
Maybe Gilly was on to something. Jonah wasn't sure he was really ready to go back to the beginning of his so called life. He knew he had a lot more than most. After hearing about Gilly's stories of being in a orphanage, then foster care. It was a miracle as far as Jonah was concerned that Gilly turned out as normal as he did.
As we were eating, Miss Picky-Pants was inquiring what each ingredient in the soup was. I’m always torn between being honest, and having her decide that she wont be consuming THAT, thank you very much, and telling her that everything is made of chocolate, in the hope that she might believe me and eat everything quickly and nicely. Last night I opted for the former, informing her that the items-in-question were lentils.
5. But this week I was enjoying my last ‘free’ days for several weeks.
There are indeed vacant and underutilized buildings, but some would be more active absent FCR's project. As Dean Street resident Peter Krashes told WNYC's Andrea Bernstein last December: This is inside the footprint, right, a lot of the property has the appearance of being more dormant. That’s one of the things that people miss when they walk here they don’t understand that what was a pretty active area has been emptied.
Defense might’ve been a target but the Bills made the splash of the NFL agreeing to terms with former Houston Texans DE/OLB Mario Williams on a six year deal worth up to $100 million.
So we were on our way to North Conway, NH for a family vacation, described in tourism magazines as the shopping mecca of NH which makes me snicker quite a bit. Many of you know that it's a quick ride up there but with two kids in tow it's never that way but we somehow managed to get up there rather quickly and only stopped for ice cream once along the way. It was a good old rest stop novelty item had by Holly. Anyways, on our way up Rt 16 heading towards Conway we saw the cutest shop, The Dam Ice Cream Shop, located amazingly on a dam. We took a mental note and continued on.
"For they've taken young James Adie for armed robbery.
Whatever your take on non original members this is Rockin' good fun.
Aomame leads a sort of double life between her work as a fitness trainer specializing in deep tissue stretching and her secret life as a killer of despicable men via a specialized method. She is mostly cold and calculating. She is sexually attracted to balding men but keeps her heart closed. I found her interesting, but not likeable.
And what of Kṛṣṇa’s constant companions: Śrutadeva, Uddhava and so on; and what of Sunanda and Nanda, the best among leaders of the Sātvata family???
How did David feel about her?
So here goes: (My hidden journaling is attached to the "Dream" pull tab to the right of my photo):
This week, Cheryl picked a lovely color palette for us work on, and we want to see ALL the colors from this palette, so here we go...
In my next meltdown post, I'll try to cover coping in adults.
Patrick Honohan, Ireland's central bank governor, said at a conference Saturday that a Greek divorce wouldn't necessarily be "fatal" for the currency union and could "technically" be managed. Dutch Finance Minister Jan Kees de Jager said Monday ahead of a meeting of euro-zone finance ministers in Brussels that the "contagion risk would be far, far smaller than one-and-a-half years ago."
The whole altercation happened within 15 minutes, Jacksonville Police arrived on the scene at 1:55 am to find Skinner and Everette dead in the home.
Sarah’s lip pushed out slightly. She bit it. Amy stared vaguely at her mother’s face, clenched in anticipation of something. Mommy dismissed them with a grand wave.
Anyhow, I just have NOT felt like blogging lately. Not sure why. I mean, in Istanbul it was largely because the thought of sitting at a computer in a hotel lobby just did not appeal when all I wanted to do was lie down and rest my aching feet. But now I am back from Turkey and I still just don't feel the mojo. part of it might be that I just have too much to write and so, by default, I go on the fritz and write nothing.
5) Back to the Yaston bard! Give him the sheet of music and he'll give you the compass back! He said it's no longer rusty because he shined it for you. Ain't that swell. You now got another item for your boat!
It doesn't go together as easy as it looks when you aren't doing it random but it a pattern.
I have read that you can even “sun” your diapers if it is raining outside. I haven’t personally tried this, but those of you who live in damp climates might need to give it a shot!
I went through so many colors in my head.... I thought about black. But there is a reason I don't use it and I knew I couldn't embrace it. I tried it in my last house once on a dresser. It lasted for 3 weeks and I just couldn't live with it. So then I selected canary yellow. But after thinking about it, that color felt just too easy. I was too happy to do yellow projects and of course, this is supposed to be a challenge. I knew I wanted something that would complement the current colors I have in my main living spaces, like my dining room and my living room. So after talking it over with my mom, I ended up choosing....
This week we have seen an amazing power grab by the US Attorney General. To quote Eric Holder:
This is the yummy photo inspiration for this weeks Moxie Fab World Tuesday Trigger, as soon as I saw the chocolate and pink together (what a fabulous combination) I knew I had to join in the fun!
“It provides greater incentive to build farther from the core,” Lieber said, which sounds plausible. Then again, critics have suggested that the extension of the subway is an incentive in itself. “It seems particularly hard to justify committing to a policy of property tax cuts several years in advance of market conditions, and inconsistent with committing billions of dollars of public infrastructure investment,” testified James Parrott of the Fiscal Policy Institute in 2006 at a hearing before the New York City Industrial Development Agency.
The thing is, people look at us Lolitas and only see oddly dressed girls, with weird dresses but to be a good Lolita, you have to have a great fashion sense. The saying: "Brand only doesn't make a good Lolita", is 100% true. You need to know how to put the pieces together. We don't "dress poorly" because we have no fashion sense. It's the people who only see "not normal", "not according to the run-of-the-mill fashion rules".
“We’re bringing polo to the public. Well, not exactly the public,” said one staff member. “That man over there is the son of an army general. That one’s grandfather was mayor of Beijing.” (New anti-nepotism laws should prevent more recurances of this sort of thing . . . )
Reference : H.P. Venkata Rao.
OG=1.054@68F
turns the earth
There should be between 50-60 horses/athletes at the three zone trials; Central Zone will host the first of the three trials from June 18-20 in Danville, IL. East Zone will be held at Fair Hill in Elkton, MD during June 21-23 and the Selectors and Chef and veterinarians will conclude their marathon evaluations on the West Coast from June 24-26 (Prineville, OR). Footing for all three trials should be very close to what is anticipated in Kentucky at WEG and although the West Coast trial may not be as humid as Kentucky could be, the Central and East trials should come pretty close to what we can expect in Kentucky.
Hopefully my SickBuckets will nap and we will have some of this
Celebrated Daddy's birthday.
The liquid inside young coconuts can be used as substitute for blood plasma.
“Yes; — that was his own field.”
For the last two years, success as a computer science major has definitely proven to be something completely relative. Many students in this major in this university will define a successful strategy or technique based on the grade that they have achieved, while others like me might define it to account for amount of time invested. I have an extremely busy lifestyle at UCSD, demanding a very organized system for managing my time; this is why the strategies I use the most are usually strategies that will, in my opinion, grant me the highest amount of academic benefit in the most efficient amount of time.
Uncle Will and Aunt Mary came out tonight and staid for quite a while.
Quin -Do chores
I gave season one of this to Sarah for Christmas and we got totally hooked back into Chuck. So much so that it is the show I tend to look forward to most each week. Although I have to admit that I’m not 100% with this new Chuck 2.0 yet. I’m not sure that I like his new “I’m a spy, damnit” attitude. It seems to have happened too fast. But I’m on board, and willing to let them show me what they have in store. Adam Baldwin, by the way is one of the best things on TV. Although I greatly miss Anna!
but always six. It was fun and
Levon Helm has a very different story. Levon is the real deal. He was a musician and songwriter who lived to create. He was the drummer for the Band, for which he sang songs which feel as though they had always been there. ‘The Night They Drove Old Dixie Down’, ‘Rag Mama Rag’ and ‘Up On Cripple Creek’ are timeless pieces of Americana. He didn’t care about commercial success. He wasn’t looking to be famous. He was the Everyman. He sang for all the nameless men who populated the American landscape from it’s very inception. You can hear Daniel Boone, Davy Crockett, Jesse James, Mark Twain, and James Dean in his voice. He managed to achieve that universality, that anonymous timeless quality that Johnny Cash and Willie Nelson aspired to but whose vivid personalities prevented. Levon Helm is a ghost. He was totally devoted to the music and evoking the spirit of America with his work. Levon Helm wanted to blend into the background and be remembered by other musicians. He could care less about anything more than that. He will be missed because the honest ones come along infrequently. Most artists are swayed by the star making machinery, and it affects their artistry, Levon Helm stayed true to his muse.
All of it.
“We need to find a fair solution,” she said. “It doesn’t serve any purpose to try and push something through that’s going to affect so many people.”
2And he laid hold on the dragon, that old serpent, which is the Devil, and Satan, and bound him a thousand years,
Rick ended up winning the race!! There were 2 runners who finished ahead of him but they both went off course so they were DQ'd. Rick may have a broken finger from a fall on the first loop but was still able to put down an awesome time. Kevin Dorsey took second and Carey Smith took 3rd place.
* Spirituality in Television and Film
You’ll never lose your sanity
I encourage all of you today: go, write the vision! Be specific as possible and do it in good faith knowing that if it is for you and if you work at it and towards it, it will happen!
The circle widens as a man grows wise.
Blend well. Fold in whipped topping. Pour over crackers, cover
After Saturday’s fatality and last week’s hit and run, the Austin cycling community has galvanized. We will be riding from the City Hall to the state capital building. We are fed up. We want safer infrastructure for cyclists. We want accountability for drivers who hit cyclists. We want accountability for drivers who kill cyclists.
Nothing good came of all this education (except that I didn’t end up in Viet Nam… I was invited but previous commitments made it impossible for me to accept… sorry Lyndon).
There is ample evidence that Al Qaeda as US sponsored “intelligence asset” is “live and kicking”. Since 9/11, Al Qaeda has developed into a multinational entity with “subsidiaries” in various geopolitical hotspots around the world.
I’m a farmer, peaceful warrior by nature. I want to hug trees and run through the waves.
_____I don't ask for much. But please, for the love of Christ, for my own personal well-being, and for the fact that you're annoying the f**king piss out of me.....please.....SHUT.THE.F**K.UP!
Always been abandoned
Okay so we have already dealt with the fact that this week, as with every other week of his existence, Obama has clearly shown he knows nothing (possibly less than nothing) about economics. But that’s not the worst part. If it was just his idiocy I might not feel my blood pressure jump to unhealthy levels every time I’ve heard him speak this last week. No the reason I’m insulted by Obama’s words is not his economic ignorance, but because it is a perverted and near evil vision of human nature and government.
Okay, enough of my opinions. Here’s a poll. Tell me who you want to win:
But in her web she still delights
The third intifada might indeed contain many of the characteristics of its first predecessor. But if the diversity and creativity present in the foundation being built today is any indicator, its beginning will take us by surprise, not because it will be sudden, but because it didn’t look like a beginning at all.
The source of this knowledge and information is The Oxford Companion to Beer and it boldly claims to be the 'most comprehensive reference book ever published about the popular and diverse fermented beverage in the world today'.
I suppose it's relevant to touch on the fact that the actual value of the Disney Dining Plan is slowly becoming obsolete. I wish I could remember how much the DDP cost when it first premiered but I believe it was around the ballpark of $35 per night per adult. Back then the only DDP offered was what is now referred to as the Basic Dining Plan. And back then you were given an appetizer, entree, and dessert with a table service credit. On top of that your gratuity was included in the meal plan!
Production and Harvest
The students studied binders full of correspondence between Moses and O’Malley, which are on display in the exhibit, and seemed to universally come to the conclusion that O’Malley has shouldered an unfair amount of the blame for the Dodgers leaving.
Later that night, we went to Potomac Mills as a family, and because (you all are gonna love this) my belly started to hurt, I switched from my tighter fitting cords to a much nicer looser fitting pair of loft pants in a cotton sateen. God bless the roomier fit of Loft pants!
Many months ago I made the expensive error of picking up a slow-cooker magazine cookbook special off the grocery store shelf. It was from a reputable company and full of what appeared to be tasty recipes. Upon opening it though I was so disappointed to find that it was full of recipes using canned ingredients, pre-packaged big brand products and had relatively few options for recipes made from scratch. So, I had to find something else that worked. I rely on the slow-cooker to make dinner for us while we go about our daily business and am always checking out new recipes.
A conservative will simply laugh and be so convinced of the absolute truth of this history that it will be forwarded immediately to other true believers and, of course, to more liberals....just to piss them off.
As always with Galloway, by his friends shall ye know him. At his main rally he was supported by Abjol Miah, a leading figure in both Respect and the Islamic Forum for Europe (IFE), an extremist organisation which wants the creation of a sharia state in Europe. Also on board was the Muslim Public Affairs Committee (MPAC), a group which previously campaigned against a Labour Member of Parliament for being “Jewish” (she wasn’t, not that it matters).
That was really hard about the Biennale…
(Where can you get better benefits?)
Would you like to make your work-day more enjoyable for you and your colleagues/boss/employees? Think about some of these…
I need to remember that God did not say I have to do this alone.
Luckily, just as I began to create some rather elaborate escape plans in my mind, the doctors and nurses who had been working with me since my admission declared that I was stable enough to go home. My girls looked great, my cervix had not changed, and while I was still contracting like whoa, it didn't appear that I would go into active labor anytime soon. So, I was discharged. After THREE WEEKS in the hospital, I finally got to go home.
Following the hype and optimism surrounding the New South Africa of 1994, we have seen nothing resembling the promised Rainbow, only the following:
Now to somehow find some time during the week so I can sit and play!
I picked songs that, no matter what, bring a smile to my face. They make me close my eyes and go somewhere else. They do it to me. In no particular order, here they are:
***As many of you have pointed out, you don't need to spend $20 on ONE diaper. You can buy a dozen prefolds and 3 covers for under $50...and that would be enough diapers to get you through an entire day.
‘Eat,’ they hissed at me. ‘Eat.’
(Wow, that’s a lot of tags.)
For example, here's one I'll never forget:
Take some time to view the videos below that can give you a greater understanding of the Porsche Human Performance Centre for one’s health and driving-specific fitness levels. The centre is there for advice, exercise and nutritional plans are prescribed to provide structure and motivation to achieve ones goals. A heat chamber is available for specialist acclimation training for racing drivers and endurance athletes prior to racing in hot climates.
E is for the eagle hawk, which plays havoc with our flocks;
Yepsen has that permanently rumpled look that reporters probably think makes them look like Dustin Hoffman playing Carl Bernstein in All the President’s Men.
I hope you all are having a better Monday than me!
And as I stand up, there's a van coming up the street with a gas-company logo. I wave it down, it seems that the morning before, a water main had burst, eventually fountaining through the asphalt, but... at the same time, the ground movement had fractured the gas main, and water had filled it, causing troubles downhill from here.
I am thankful my husband and my children encouraged me to get on Facebook! Through Facebook I have connected with family and friends. I found my next door neighbor way back when we were kids, she and her mother are both on Facebook. We've had a lot of fun reminiscing. I found another girl who lived up the street for a couple of years we were good friends but lost contact since her family moved around the country. Sadly I found a friend from high school but didn't send her a friend request at the time, a few months later on a memorial page for our high school, I discovered she died Dec. 2010. I had not heard from her in many years.
A slice of William & Kate’s eight-tiered fruit cake, which took designer Fiona Cairns five weeks to decorate (including 900 sugar-paste flowers, and 17 types of foliage and blooms), will be auctioned online.
Almost twenty years after scoring a hit with Jesse James Fox tried to repeat their success in 1957. With a screenplay based on and crediting Nunnally Johnson’s 1939 effort, the studio tagged ‘The True Story’ onto the title and director Nicholas Ray was handed the task of trying to offer a fresh perspective on this oft-told tale. So, does this one actually tell the true story? Well, not exactly since the time-line is more than a bit suspect, although it does get quite a few things right which the earlier version didn’t.
Emerson: Just practicing my chewing. *om nom nom nom*
Many sites provide badges, little graphics that represent the site or some achievement, to supporters who then post them on their blogs or other sites. One example of this is on LinkedIn. When you join a LinkedIn group, you have the option to display the group’s badge on your profile so others see you’re a member. Badges are also given by sites like FourSquare to signify some achievement or status. It’s a good way to enable and encourage evangelists. There are also other types of badges that recognize achieve­ments of your supporters, such as “Top Blogger” or “Most Valuable Evangelist.”
I was more content when I was all so self contained, but I don't want that contentment back. It's alright to yearn in winter. And be fragile. And crave warmth. Things happen in their own time. I may as well crave spring, and I do, but I think this longing in me has made me more whole. I feel more tender toward myself and toward others. I fell asleep last night thinking of Mwa and Danielle and Jo, thinking of the snow of Europe. I heard on the BBC that people in the Netherlands and in Germany were being advised to stay indoors because it is so dangerously cold. I worried about them, about you my friends. Do you have enough to eat? Do you have warm blankets and wool socks? And so perhaps this softening, this need is not useless after all. When one is hard and self contained there is no room for others to get inside. I want to let this softening happen, and not try to be so tough.
Why do we think it's our job to judge?
I designed the layout in Adobe Illustrator and I had the images printed as 11 x 14s at Costco. They were only $2.99 a piece!
It was the first time I'd made naans. Hollie and I baked them together and they came out perfect. So cool!!
This is the part where I start contemplating this whole concept we call “time,” the 4th dimension.
as our East Coast minds told us that time of the morning was just
There is a blue ink stamp on the back of torso that looks like the #9.
In Chicago, where I was raised in fear, the bad weather roars in from the West. It comes fast and furious and makes you pray for mercy.
I walked back into our home feeling rejuvenated. Then I saw her. Baby Monkey Girl ran toward me, her face winched in distress and her arms open wide. Her pitiful pout turned into a loud cry as she drew near. Scooping her up, I asked if she hurt herself. She shook her head and suddenly it hit me. She was upset simply because her world was out of order. My mini escape hadn't gone undetected. She had her daddy and her siblings, but that wasn't enough. :::sigh::: So much for freedom.
Verdict: NUMBER ONE PLACE ON MY HIT LIST!!
I just asked people to start showing up at our house and one by one, they started "dropping by." Until he eventually figured out that I had actually planned something and that 40 people didn't just "happen to be in the neighborhood..." on Friday night.
5. Hit It Hold It Back
Army Mechanics: Players can grow their army by recruiting defeated Warlords and their Pokémon. After a kingdom is conquered, players will also have access to the kingdom facilities such as training grounds, shops to buy items and mines for money. Players can also strengthen their army by linking with Pokémon. Warlords can have various linked Pokémon and switch between them before battle to strategically prepare for the type of battle they are about to engage in.
This is effectively India's first patent compulsory licensing order in the post TRIPS era (there have been compulsory licenses issued under the Patents Act, 1970, but these were all prior to the 2005 amendments).
Success, I have won
-YES LOCK!
Here's the video
Pressure cook the dal with enough water, garlic and turmeric.
Until next time, take care of yourselves. And each other. Especially you, Skippy.
My overall goal, back then, was to become a journalist. I applied to four university’s and got accepted to Ryerson Polytechnical (now Ryerson University) for a two-year journalism program after I finished my first degree which was a BA (I always make the sound of a goat here because really it’s a useless degree unless you’re going after more education, which I did). I had role models and I wanted to be just like ? from CBC, but alas CBC was into deep cuts when I finished my degree so I quickly had to adjust my thinking. I went into public relations. Don’t groan. I actually loved it. My first job was as editor of Saint Mary’s University’s faculty paper. This was my first exposure to talking to professors and fishing out stories that I could write which made sense to everyone. It was challenging but
One of the best shots taken with the iPhone 4 using HDR Fusion APP editing made with Filterstorm and Snapseed.
3. Physio was kinda fun on Thursday – minus the pain when she rolled out my IT band. I enjoy being attached to the machine that tingles my knees while they are being iced. I nearly fell asleep. I also got some exercises to do at home to strengthen my glutes and quads.
I know that lameness gods are playing a joke on me. I get it. I said in my last post that Farno WAS lame but is CURRENTLY sound. Hahahahahaha!!!
almost seemed crooked which really made
Now is not the time to lay blame for lack of cleanup on our government. Now is the time to find any and all assets available to assist in the massive disaster, and once completed....go after the assholes responsible. (I would suggest freezing BP's assets, so no huge bonuses are paid and money siphoned away from helping those affected by this spill).
… After teaching Will Muschamp a lesson Saturday night in the Swamp, Saban was asked in a creative way if he thought Alabama was the best team in America. Lenn Robbins of the New York Post asked that question by saying he wasn’t going to ask that question.
In many ways this sad story of Claus’ life is repeated in that of Friso: a homosexual being married to a woman, experimenting with sexual preferences in the USA because it is ‘far from home’, the (danger of) being blackmailed and- on an even more sinister note- evidence of pedophilia and other forms of child abuse.
From heart to brain and back again,
Happy Thursday.... and on the eve of a very British, very old fashioned love story (of course I'm talking about the Royal "I dos" tomorrow) I bring you Talli's next top tip - (I really like this one :))
- End date: October 2011 (please send in your patches till 1st of October)
As this was the first I heard of it, I arrived a little early as I didn't really know what to expect. This is an annual event I found out, and was celebrating it's 5th year. The motto of Glam-A-Thon is "Kiss Breast Cancer Goodbye". That seems like a very nice sendoff to a brutal disease.
3. "I don't want to say anything further
Citing a report published in 2007, Dr Sharples, a co-leader of the Maori Party, said Maori were 11 times more likely to be remanded in custody than Europeans awaiting court appearance or sentencing, adding that Maori received about twice as many custodial sentences as Europeans.
Finances were so tight in the 1950s, that BAM’s home at 30 Lafayette Ave. was very nearly sold to Long Island University, which would have converted it into classrooms and a gymnasium. By the time Harvey Lichtenstein took the reins of BAM in 1967, sections of the building were being rented out to a judo academy and a boy’s prep school.
This is not specifically a New England issue, just one I noticed since not relying on a book. I had no idea what this problem was, and the frustration of seeing skinny oak leaves with the same names as wide oak leaves increased. I started to wonder if New England tree naming was the same as Boston street naming, have several different trees with the same name, and only the locals will know what’s going on.
Through the message, the Lord reminded us of this:
Director Campbell has plenty of experience with big budget franchise movies, having helmed two movies each of the James Bond and Zorro series. His job here is to introduce non-fans to the Green Lantern universe while at the same time not alienating the existing fan base of the hero.
No time...but I do check in to see if there are comments or whatever and somehow stumbled on this old post - dating back to 2008. It was while Elie was a commander of a checkpoint though now that I know more of what that included, I am so much more grateful to the bullet-proof vest...or what I thought was a bullet-proof vest at the time. Now, Elie will laugh and tell me that it wasn't really bullet-proof but offered some measure of protection - or maybe it was. I don't really remember.
See the photograph…in North Carolina it was against the law for blacks and whites to marry. I am old enough to remember the discrimination against interracial couples that existed into the late sixties and even later in many areas around the country. AND though interracial is legal now in all states, the 1865 attitudes are still the same for some people in backwards states like North Carolina, Mississippi, Alabama…all the die-hard Rethuglican, Tea Party supporting bigots.
Meltzer MI, Cox NJ, Fukuda K. The economic impact of pandemic influenza in the United States: priorities for intervention. Emerg Infect Dis 1999; 5: 659-671.
Police are still actively working toward identifying suspects responsible for 10 residential burglaries throughout the township occurring since Sept. 11.
We would always have a filling and hot breakfast, something I have no idea how my mum actually managed. She used to wake up at 5 AM so we could have hot breakfasts... I realise now how lucky we were! Then mum would cook lunch for whoever was at home, make up our lunchboxes and rush out to her school, where she worked as a teacher. Everything was sorted by 8.15 AM, cause she had an hour commute to get to work. And if you've ever commuted in India, you will know exactly how stressful it is with the heat and dust, and crowds all pressing in. My mum is a supermum, and now that I am a mum myself, I find myself appreciating her more and more every passing day!
Lord Jesus Christ, Son of God, deliver me from believing and obeying idols.
Travel by horse-drawn cart through green fields to Muckross House, an historic Victorian estate that borders the picturesque lake in Killarney National Park, a UNESCO World Heritage Site.Lunch at Muckross House
I am particularly drawn to her "vintage" women in the process of dressing, in their private bubbles of what appears to be preparations for an adventure of some sort. Somehow they seem to waver between hope and disappointment -- melancholy and anticipation. I'm not an art critic, but those were the sentiments her paintings evoked in me and I find it fascinating when a work of art triggers an emotion.
A study by graft watchdog Transparency International last year pointed to massive local level corruption resulting in millions of students not having desks, chairs or books.
Great Divide - Hibernation
1. The widespread acclaim and international recognition accorded the foreign national by recognized experts.
The Drop also finds me thinking about the origin of evil. It’s one of the themes in the novel and Harry has a lot of thoughts about evil and the source of it. Is it nature? Or is it nurture? Harry is unsure. He can see it both ways. It gives the reader a lot to think about as we read and digest.
Overall, starting your business out of your home (or close to your home) is smart if you can follow these guidelines:
Leben is the Master.
I could ask Magdalene now to stroll down there with her kids, if she’s not too busy, and just check out if I’m still around. In her memory.
7 SUPERMARKETS in the UK know more about their customers than the government does. They use loyalty cards to determine your income and what your interests are.
I thought the book was very interesting, although I don’t think many people would want to read this. If you are at all interested in the medical field, you would probably like it.
'Is this your thimble?' the Lord asked. The seamstress replied, 'Yes.' The Lord was pleased with the woman's honesty and gave her all three thimbles to keep, and the seamstress went home happy.
As a sweet tooth, it's frustrating to have no offer of dessert at a bar, but to have homemade sweets on the menu is an incredulous offer too good to refuse. Freda's has a pastry chef on board, with different cakes baked each day. The carrot cake is heavily spiced, a dark moist cake studded with walnuts.
From the lightning in the sky
Frankie smiled. Everyone else around here called him Francis, except for Tommy. Just as he was the only one who called the angelic Dominican "Tommy".
Looking over you and me
I definitely need a break from the everyday. I want sometime alone. I mean completely alone. I want to be somewhere by a lake or a river or something so that I can spend some time gathering my thoughts and figuring out what my next step is. Yes, I need a vacation, but I need more than that. I want to disconnect myself from everything for a little bit. No cellphone, no computer, no TV. I want to lose myself somewhere for a while. I have to because if I don't, I will go insane. I'm tired of listening to the fighting, the stupidity. Tired of being stuck in the middle of my parents' drama and not being allowed to deal with my own. Why won't they just get divorced? Why won't they talk to each other and try to work things out? I'm tired of being the mediator. I can't have a life of my own. The next question will be, "Why don't you just move out?" The answer is because it would just be ten times worse if I wasn't here. Dad would call me to bitch about mom, and Mom would call me to bitch about dad and everything else. I would never get a moment's rest. I would be expected to visit all the time. It's just easier to live here amongst the drama and insanity than it is to not.
She considered doing stomach crunches, but decided she ate light enough at dinner. That made up for the extra French Toast.
Hurley-"To blow stuff up?"
Everyone likes reading their favourite magazine whether it is on holiday, in a cosy coffee shop or when tucked up in bed ill. However financial pressures on the magazine industry means that the way you read magazines in the future may be very different.
Now I don’t think Mr. Romney has a problem with Ms. Romney staying home and working to manage the staff helping to raise the Romney boys. In fact, I’m willing to bet Mr. Romney doesn’t have a problem with anyone who stays at home to do the hard work of raising a family as long as it happens without any financial assistance from government. What actually leads to the loss of dignity is the need for financial aid. Everybody likes to say that working at home as a mother might be the hardest form of work on the planet. But if that very hard work comes only with the assistance of government, then it really isn’t worth a damn and we’d be better off paying more to put the child in the hands of strangers so that everybody can have dignity. However, I’m pretty sure that if you asked most mothers they’d say that they’d rather stay at home and raise their child and suffer the loss of their dignity to people who don’t value their contribution to society’s future rather than have government pay to put the child in a daycare so that they can go to a job that they can run the risk of losing when they have to take off in order to take care of the child that got sick at the daycare the state paid to put the child in while the mother earned dignity.
- We did go for a walk down the street with the boys in their stroller before I started making dinner, which was very nice too.
“Last, but not yeast.” Where did the cool puns go…
I have loved Elie from before he was born. I loved him the moment I held him, each time he turned those blue eyes towards me. I have loved him into the army, through it and out of it and I am loving him now - even as the flustered groom.
Previous City Halls had lasted about thirty years apiece, but the 1938 Municipal Building was already a problem by 1953. Some police officers had their desks in the third floor hallway, and the jail was so crowded that a deal was struck for the City to put its prisoners in the County Jail. An expansion proposed in 1953 didn’t get off the ground until 1956.
The mayor’s staff, under strict orders from Mr. Bloomberg, did not lobby the owner of the park, Brookfield Office Properties, about whether to push ahead, leaving the decision up to the company’s management, according to several people involved in the discussions.
The LORD is in his holy temple; the LORD’s throne is in heaven; his eyes see, his eyelids test the children of man.
Moon could not take his eyes off the old whippet! What was he doing....what was he thinking, what was he......?"
12 Keep it Up
It’s entirely up to you if you want to have one. Base the decision on the feelings and relationships of all four people involved. For example, if it’s known that the groom and your mom don’t get along you may not want to force them to dance together.
Schlafly Irish Extra Stout
1st place will recieve an interview PLUS a $5 giftcard from Amazon.
After the environmental clearance to the project was suspended by the National Green Tribunal (NGT), the company has closed down its field office from Noliasahi. But we want the company to completely pack up and go from our area.
That moment you can not curb
This changes all the time. I'm an avid reader. Some of my favorite authors though are James Patterson, Charlaine Harris and Agatha Christie (I am a huge Poirot fan!). Come to think of it, all of those people are mystery writers...I sense a trend. ;)
I have proclaimed today a failure day. I failed at shopping. I failed at mailing Christmas cards (mailed all the ones WITHOUT stamps, not the ones with stamps. Discovered 5 hours later). I failed at singing.
Like Sabaditsch-Wolff and Zemmour, Wilders could join the growing group of people convicted of, and punished for, telling the truth.
Other events during the week include:
Tomorrow: Another coat of polyurethane on bookshelf-shelves, which will be 100% done (not counting optional 400-grit final sanding).
I stared at the pen, turning it around to make sure …
What was the book you loved most as a child?
In my view, it’s not at all clear that this threshold is passed. The sentencer had the option to impose a high level community order – additional unpaid work and curfew – and I cannot see why this could not be justified. In this case, District Judge Baldwin clearly thought otherwise, possibly in light of that background of serious public disorder.
“Lady Day and John Coltrane”,
- I say: The bits with that dull politician are really driving me mad. Boooorrriiiinng.
Kindly read the rules before you link up
I don't know how long these children will be in our home. I don't know if Jerome will be given his next breath. I don't know if I will step foot on another plane to Africa to see the orphans I love so much. I don't know, I don't know, I don't know.
What can I say? Just that this woman makes the most beautiful clothes I've ever seen AND she's the brains behind the brilliant Mad Men Dress Challenge.
*It is also currently the only way of embedding Google Docs (or other iframe widgets) in a free wordpress.com blog that offers full functionality.
And now you have it to strike fear.
Today, however is the final straw. Waking up at 5am on my day off with severe in pain in my back and right side from a kidney stone, was beyond necessary. This is it you have to go. It's just not working out and quite frankly I'm wondering if you're out to kill me.
I plan on purchasing more pillow covers from Elegant Touch as we decorate our home. Here are some of my favorites from their Etsy shop:
We caught a few shows (the Disney Jr Live show is awesome for anyone with little ones), rode a few rides, caught the parade, and finally saw the car stunt show. It was awesome and Noah loved it!!!
This weekend we’ve travelled up to Oxfordshire to see the family and to meet up with friends we haven’t seen this year. While we were in the Aldermaston area we popped in to see Tom and Jan on nb Waiouru on the Kennet and Avon canal. We hadn’t seen them since they came out with us on ‘Chance’ for the day last May and so we had a good catch up with them. It was good to see that work is in progress on nb Waiouru now.
This lack of appeal on the device makes no difference to the publishers - after all they have already made their sale. But it does make a difference to writers. If someone buys a paper book, there is a good chance it will be read - or recycled via a charity or thrift shop to someone who will read it. On the kindle, a book can get lost in a list for a long time, and as it takes up little space, may never be read.
Submitted by Alyssa Macy –
To follow the previous example, this would involve the smaller businessman being swindled and strung along by the bigger one (i.e. the one who appears to be more illuminated and awake to the various forms of material control). The smaller businessman is being told that he can have his additional profits (i.e he can have his ‘liberation’) if he’s patient and does what the bigger one says.
it's early. real early. I'm pretty sure the dairy farmers weren't even up when our alarm when off this morning. It's back to the LCCT for us as we are heading to Cambodia, more specifically Phnom Penh.
Publisher: Walker & Company
My experience getting “ripped”
ISBN-10: 1612094473 ISBN-13: 978-1612094472
“So they went into the portal?” Creme asked, staring at the statues again. “Did they fit? They are big.”
I'm a bit late posting for WOYWW. We've been busy today - shopping for the kids before they go back to school next week - I did manage to take a detour to a craft shop too, I picked up a Metric Scor-Pal and a Martha Stewart Arch Lattice Punch (can't wait to start playing with these!!!).
Mix group two together, and then add to the first group stirring only lightly - just enough to moisten the flour mixture.
The goal of listening only begins with understanding; it ends with making others feel understood.
In an executive summary of its report released on Wednesday, it found that the municipality was in total disarray with no proper management and financial control.
Everyone should know that ANY employee of (The Company) that have been with the company for less than 18 months and are considering leaving for another opportunity, are not entitled to be paid for, or allowed to take accrued vacation.
Listening to my wife isn’t difficult, but it isn’t easy either. It actually takes energy and effort on my part! I’m not trying to be derogatory towards my wife in any way, I’m only highlighting the autopilot I tend to fly on, the no listening programme.
provided by various recording executives, album cover
One can go further and estimate the “selection coefficient” against the dark moths assuming they live several days in the wild. That selective coefficient is between 0.1 and 0.2, which means that, relative to the light moths, the dark moths suffer a survival disadvantage of 10-20% per generation in unpolluted woods. To evolutionists that is very strong natural selection, and it’s easily able to account for the increase in frequency of the light form since the Clean Air laws were passed in the 1950s.
Site Selection magazine ranked the Pittsburgh region (including seven counties) number seven in its “2008 Top Metros by Number of Projects.” With a count of 79 projects in the area, Pittsburgh sits between the New York-Newark-Edision and Colombus markets. The state of Pennsylvania ranked fourth among states, and Pittsburgh’s market played a major role in that ranking.
I decided to change it back up
strikes your fancy, different-sized cubes do have different suggested uses.
Yup, it’s gonna be a while before I start playing.
Apparent Attenuation: 75%
a lot more to offer. The National Exhibition Centre is a great source of
One certain takeaway from the Bilski opinion is that, if you expected any sort of closure whatsoever on 35 U.S.C. §101, you were sorely disappointed (see Rader dissent on that). While most practitioners have scoured Bilski to divine meaning from the opinion for computer software, it is becoming apparent that Bilski was not intended to resolve issues pertaining to computers, and especially ones considered "machines" for the purposes of section 101.
Until next year.
If you are looking for a labyrinth near you, maybe you will find one here:
Because “I Am a Singer” is about singing, the vocalist is the main qualifier. If a singer was previously part of a band, but is no longer part of the band, they must be picked as a solo singer, instead of with their past band: Im Jaebum (formerly of Sinawe) and Park Wangyu (formerly of Boohwal) are examples from the show. Likewise, if an older band has a current singer that debuted with the band after 2004, the band is not eligible.
Mary of Our Christmas tree - each year, this decoration sits among the branches - accompanied by birds, santas and various other decorations.
So essentially 'family dinners' as we know it here weren't a big part of my life, growing up. Neither were desserts. The only time we got to eat sweets was usually at tea time when we would grab something from the local bakeries. Or when we had relatives over, in which case we would all pile in and head to the local (hugely famous) ice cream parlour and stuff our faces.
“I don’t… Bronislav. Are you receiving these images?”
Michael: The name of Adam in his premortal life, Michael helped Jehovah create the earth. A native of Missouri, Michael will be making a special appearance with Jesus, followed by a six-week booking at the Osmond theater in Branson.
It has been my experience that the addict is usually an accomplished con man, and the first person they con is themselves. Unless or until he can admit that he is a chameleon, he can not change it. I have noticed that when he has no one to play to, depression drove him.
and my grand attempt to get to grips with the horrors. I signed up for a knitting day with a wonderful norwegian lady, Annemor Sundbo, and attempted to knit gorgeous norwegian style mittens. Before we go any further the next photos are work NOT of my hands as much as I wish it were - I'll just have to aim towards it!!
This is going to take a bit though because it's pretty bad up there.
** Natalie Portman. Her leading man would be Ian Somerhalder.
What to do? Try fear. Create division, stir resentment, by whatever means necessary — bogus court challenges, dead-end Senate bills and a forest of straw men.
"Some lovely girls around me" - does that count the bloke at the back? - "we've got some lovely girls for you now". It's the debut of Dance Troupe To Be Named but not that auspicious a beginning, stuck out on a tiny stage in tops that are attached to long bits of fabric they have to keep hold of throughout. All six get their turn at smiling at their own close-up twice over before some spinning and general veil waving. Still, it's something to build from.
The Summit Team members were charged with talking with librarians, distributors, and publishers about how readers find books. We met in focus groups, one-on-one interviews, catch-as-catch-can talks on the trade show floor, and at meals. Everyone we talked with was happy to share ideas with us—frequently they seemed thrilled that someone would ask!
“Fine,” Mesdan says quietly. “But Kesta won’t be able to watch you. He’ll be busy administering initiation.”
Many of my favourite actors to work with have been my fellow theatre cast mates from theatre productions I’ve done over the years. But in film and TV, I have been fortunate, too, and some of my favs are Hilary Swank – she’s incredibly focused. Our scenes were so intense. I learned so much from working with her on ‘The Reaping’. I loved working with Minnie Driver and Eddie Izzard on the FX TV series ’The Riches’. They are both such lovely spirited people, and were so devoted to that project. But my favourite star so far would have to be Brooke Shields, with whom I just finished working on ‘The Hot Flashes’. She is so sweet and down-to-earth, and really such a talented actor. She’s at the top of my Fav List right now, for sure.
Now my husband gets the Journal delivered to him at his office, and I simply read the Times on line.
Congratulations to all the winners, and many, many thanks to all of you who submitted. I'll be needing additional guest posts throughout the summer, so there'll be many more opportunities for y'all to submit—and keep in mind that I'm always looking for timely guest posts to run on Tuesdays and Thursdays!
Keeping my lips locked on her clit, I began fucking her with my thumb in her pussy and a finger in her ass, moving into the pussy while pulling out from the ass, then alternating: finger deep into her asshole while the thumb pulled out and tarried along the edge of her cunt lips, then back inside….
I am sorry to say, but I had forgotten a lot of these had passed. Like Dennis Hopper, wow! When did that happen?
After a massive opening day there is good reason why day 2 is the hardest to get the ball moving. Legs are more sore than any typical one night headliner show. Having this been my first festival of the year, I’m not going to lie, I was struggling. Anywho, I finally woke up after minimal sleep and a short morning nap to make it to the Do Lab in time to see Dirtybird’s own Christian Martin. Co-Founder of Dirtybird records, a tech house label that throws by far some of the best parties you can find, Christian was the perfect way to get the day going with that classic dirtybird sound that I am a very big fan of. If you are not that into minimal techno then you should take a listen to his live recorded Coachella Set, or attend any dirtybird party that may come your way. These guys are about the bass and will have you shakin your booty all night long.
LS: Boy reads girl. Girl reads boy. Girl does interview for boy and only hopes she didn't blow it.
This access was acquaint on Thursday, April 23rd, 2009 at 12:00 am.
170g bread flour
Mini Kit
This is not to suggest that other countries didn’t have to rebuild because, of course, they did. But the Russians do appear to have had a harder time than most because of the country’s leadership. All that mattered was that targets were met. As Fedya reports in his letter to the Writer:
Unfortunately due to weather conditions play has been suspended – SkySports has reported that the weather has taken a turn for the worse and heavy thunder and lightening storms are looming.
I will give you one little hint with the Easter grass. We all know how much of a mess it can make (hence why I did my wreath laying on a Columbia bag). If you have a craft room (lucky you, I’m jealous) it’s probably not that much of an issue, but I was doing this on my living room floor, trying everything I could to keep this little booger out of it:
In this post, I am going to expand on that concept a bit by describing to you how to get paid to complete offers by others while you are completing the initial qualifying offers for a site. In the business, it is referred to as Method 1 (aka – Getting Paid to Complete Trial Offers).
When she was not offering her own illuminating reviews, Molara Wood was putting together an absorbing literary package. Tolu Ogunlesi called to mind the late Cyprian “COD” Ekwensi. Like COD, he is a trained pharmacist. And like COD, he wrote about “ordinary people,” the type who rode that hideous Lagos contraption we call “molue” (a corruption of “maul it,” whatever the “it” is, according to some old-time Lagosians), chronicling their vulnerabilities without glossing over their occasional villainies.
setting in each of said plurality of developmental lines, a sequence of checkpoints;
I was starting to get quite worried about it just by looking and the price of these places.
Avocados, Hass — Mexico
Axel Maurer / keyboards
Bibliographic data: hardback, xiv + 371 pages. ISBN 978 1 84844 223 8. Price £97 (but if you buy it directly from the publisher it's just £87.30. Also available as an ebook (ISBN) 978 1 78100 262 9. Rupture factor: not great. Book's web page here.
WFTU has 70 million affiliated members, with 150 organizations in Latin America alone. The U.S. and Canada are the only countries in the Western Hemisphere that have no affiliates.
For nine of those years, after the Plejarans opened my memories as having come from Erra, I worked against the Cabal within — that is, the White Hats. And like I have said, when I realized the White Hats had been compromised, I retired from Uncle Sam’s service…
Catania, Sicily Architecture:
Surprisingly, I watched all twelve rounds of last night’s match. As expected, Mayweather dominated throughout most of the night. Miguel Cotto, Mayweather’s opponent, couldn’t seem to get much working in his favor. Mayweather is efficient, agile, and he knows what he’s doing in the ring. It was evident early on that Mayweather was unsurprisingly going to pick up the win. But regardless of the inevitable, Cotto didn’t give up. Cotto managed to throw a few punches that plummeted Mayweather’s face towards the end of the match. Despite the effort by Cotto, Mayweather seemingly had everything under control. Last night’s match ended with Mayweather being victorious upon the judges’ decision after the end of the final round.
When I asked her why it was called "white velvet," she explained that it's because it feels like velvet in your mouth. And boy, does it ever!!! The first time I made this cake, I was totally blown away by it! I never thought I could be so in love with a simple white cake. Anyway, it's now my go-to recipe. It's perfect with any kind of frosting and flavoring.
Remove from the heat. Mix in saffron, recover the pot and let sit for 5 more minutes.
Would she do anything differently?
We all left commenting that we would never take a breath of fresh air for granted again. The whole time we were there we were surrounded by dust and dirty white smoke from the burning garbage. It burned my eyes, and hundreds of flies swarmed the area.
By general encouragement and emulation,
There are other healthy treats at Re-Juice A Nation …including protein bars and salad fixings, plus delicious hot soups (including some vegetarian options). You can even make your own salad which is fun!
Certainly it would have been in better taste to post a clip from a spiritual film like "The Ten Commandments", "Ben-Hur" or "The Greatest Story Ever Told" on a day like today, but that's not how we roll here at Monster Island News. Instead we like to leave you with visions of giant rabbits covered in fake blood running and running and running .....
When I went to the prom, it was downright painful seeing ole girl in my dress. It looked great on her but I knew it would have looked fabulous on me.
And as an amateur, my mom allowed my brother and I to design our own bedrooms when I was about 12 years old. Looking back now, it must have looked like something from Mount Vernon when I was finished. Very traditional. Very proper. Then I switched rooms with my older brother several years later . . . and spent the rest of my childhood in the room he decorated with tiger printed wallpaper.
If you put the whole thing together, though you see the planet of sound (Jupiter) owning the house of communication (3rd House) as a basically positive influence, and you start to think the the person must be involved in music or in oration as a powerful speaker.
In a great number of instances Steel’s mashers are used alone, or, in other words, the whole of the mashing is effected by them; whilst in other cases they are used in combination with other mashing apparatus placed in the mash-tun. As instances, we may mention Messrs. Salt and Co.’s, of Burton-on-Trent, and Messrs. Mann, Crossman, and Paulin’s, as establishments where the former mode of working is adopted, whilst at Messrs. Truman’s, at Messrs. Allsopp’s, and at a number of other breweries, Steel’s mashers are used in addition to the ordinary “porcupine.” Where Steel’s or other separate mashers are alone employed, it is the practice to make but one mash, and to sparge the remainder of the length; whilst where mashing appliances are also provided within the tun, a series of mashes may be made, the goods being turned over during each mash.
awwww man...they changed up Blogger???!!!!! who do they think they are? FACEBOOK?????? dayyyummmmmm
But a few weeks ago, I got one again.
Fix our boys?
OLSEN GW, STEINBERG ME, LEY CA. Worksite influenza immunization programs. Insight into the implementation and cost-benefit. AAOHN J 2005; 53: 105-110.
All we become interested in is our team winning at any cost, regardless of the means, whether fair or foul, and pretty soon we don’t even seem to care if our own team wins, only that the Enemy, whoever they may be, lose. We wait, hands poised over keyboard for our Enemy to fail so that we can jump onto the internet and spout our vitriol at them.
The sort where you have to ring to be let in through the iron gates...and ring to be let out again.
I don't know what I'd say to me from ten years ago. Or even five. Of course, depending upon your philosophical bent, the whole me thing is a phantasm anyway. There is no you or me only a moment in which the untrained mind tries to affix labels to make sense of said moment. However, such tangents are better reserved for late night rants over too much coffee and too little sleep where the parties involved are far too impressed with their own intelligence.
Why was it good? I think you all know (or can guess) what happens when good ol' Bobnoxious gets a 2 hour power nap in front of basketball AND drinks a Dr. Pepper to get going (mmm...sugar and caffeine..."me corn holio"). Yes, the guy who graciously agreed to drive me home and the people between me and the band are going to wish they weren't.
The wealth of a species now in your hands,
Oh, so you think I'm being harsh or perhaps I just simply don’t see the magic or the significance of HRC. Ok, try this on for size: let's forget for a moment that the Republican in this race is John McCain. Let's pretend for a moment that it's Jeb Bush.
it rides with head held high
As you can see, Dexter was not quite as thrilled with the idea as I was, but he sure looked CUTE!﻿
Sarah took my manuscript by the throat and tore it apart, pointing out a looong series of swordfights do not a novel make. Now, Sarah knew what she was doing. Before she was an agent she'd worked long and hard as a publisher and her editing skills remain second to none. She will make your book better, much much better.
No Treasurer's report
They have pets!
For this next challenge we welcome Glitterbabes as our sponsor. They have the most gorgeous images. You should definitely go check out their store.
In all the right places
The film, made for Guardian Films, shows how Yuda and his colleagues at Harare central jail had to fill in their ballots in front of Zanu-PF activists.
Place dough on a lightly floured surface and kneed for around 8 minutes adding flour as necessary.
Secondly, our wonderful friends from 7 Kids College Fund are sponsoring us with a very generous $20 voucher to be used by the winner for anything at the shop!!
I wondered where all the animals were sleeping in that frozen night.
So in order to prove that she is capable of earning a living, I motioned the court for a vocational study to determine her employability in today’s marketplace. With her active license and her education level, the wife went off to the evaluator, who is a psychologist, for testing. The testing most likely will result in the conclusion that the wife is employable at some salary. Therefore my client’s (husband) obligation to pay a hefty alimony will be diminished because of the law of alimony, which is wife’s need in this case and husband’s ability to pay. Her need will be lowered by my proving to the judge that she can work and earn something. Her children are grown and I do believe the judge will take all of those findings into consideration in a lower alimony award than she expects.
The movie made 235 million dollars worldwide and 45 million in rentals. On a 16 million dollar budget. This thing was a giant freaking hit.
The hats pictured below left were made by Sarah Pettigrew McWilliams (1872-1958), who in her late teens operated her own dressmaking and millinery business in Washington, Kansas.
Here are some pictures of other people having a good time, on the government-sponsored play equipment right in the middle of Taksim.
-I can breastfeed
First of all, I don’t know of any Free-Range parent who is “proud” to wave off the responsibilities of parenting. Free-Range is not about negligence or sloth (well, maybe a teeny bit of sloth, but is that so terrible?). It’s about trying to assess reality and figure out whether the world has really become so much more dangerous in just one generation (since those carefree days of the Cold War) that children cannot be afforded the same kind of freedom we had.
Dear friends and readers,
God intends for each of us to be fully engaged with His kingdom purposes and plans every single day. Some days are spectacular, but most are more mundane. But even our mundane Lower Story moments help to advance God’s Upper Story agenda.
Allison Sekemoto was one of these characters. You understand her life has been a struggle to survive, and much of this is due to the tyranny of the vampires. You understand her loathing of both them and their pets. You also understand her self loathing when she becomes one of them in order to not die.
Boyfriend: "That's not really a question - more like a statement. Or just a string of random words."
In a lot of ways, Dr. Strangelove shows Kubrick really coming into what would be perceived as his "later" phase, in which his films are concerned with nothing so much as the alienation of the human soul, and the slow-burning anxiety of a seemingly perfectly balanced situation sent hopelessly and inevitably off-kilter. This was during the heart of the Cold War, when, despite how things turned out, many did earnestly believe that the world lay constantly on the brink of annihilation, and perhaps this was so. There's a real concern with this matter in Dr. Strangelove, underneath all that ludicrousness. As wry as the presentation is, and as bone dry the comedy is, the heart of this picture is quite serious.
I enjoyed ordering from KidsafeInc.com. The gate was nicely priced and it shipped out in record time!
HIDING THE THIGHS
The Spirit shall take up the human play,
So I sit straight up in my seat, damned near in tears with the music up loud so Hank III's caterwaulin' will cover up the sounds of my whimpering and went to have a root canal done. Might as well get the hurtin' over with all at once, you know?
Now from the side of the audience, the citizens who witnessed the scripted drama a few questions stand uncleared. Usually the hounding media sleuths takes care of these issues. But since they suffered from a rare version of amnesia and forgot to swoop down on the issue and grant any kind of coverage to the same, the audience stands lost.
The city itself hasn’t changed much; there is a flurry of new construction thanks to Ukraine being chosen to co-host next year’s UEFA European football championship next year along with Poland.
so those of you with more experience will probably have a million better ways of doing this -
Nov 28 – Lupo’s Heartbreak – Providence, RI (W/Cobra Starship)
My bones denounce the buckboard bounce
Here are some photos of our wonderful day there.
For a door knob, one significant button, the sky;
More please.
I don’t think Luke is writing a modern-day history as we would view it, but I do think he’s closer to attempting this than Matthew. So when Luke gives us chronological information, we can read it closer to our own type of understanding.
Now, I am excited to hear of the newest addition to Brooklyn's food suppliers, Green Hill Food Co-Op. The organization has been around for a little while now. But now, they have obtained a lease in a location. If it were one year ago, I would have lived right around the corner from the place.
The author has an active, vivid imagination. He has found that interacting with many different personalities helps create life-like characters.
And they're expertly crafted. The baker takes the time to frost these as they should be frosted: with a heavy hand and an eye for detail.
And, so, every Third Monday, we gather. And, I leave refreshed.
In general, I just don’t want too, and I don’t have to. I’ll answer why I don’t want it further detail below.
A Novel by Christine Mehring
Dinner was more or less a pleasant experience, though Brulee commented that there was far too mcuh food. Though the look on her face when she first tried the hardtack was hilarious. Served her right for wanting it the first place.
Let me know you understand my story, HEAL MY SOUL
Mr Obama Snr had grown up in Kenya under British rule and aroused the fears of both colonial officers and American officials when he won a chance to study in Hawaii. The officials felt Kenyan students were ‘academically inferior’ with a ‘bad reputation’ for turning anti-American.
There is a plethora of people to choose from, just on G+ alone, to experiment on and get feedback!
I wanted to share an amazing deal I got at Old Navy last Saturday. All denim shorts were 60% off and I had a Groupon to use so I went to the store. My Groupon was a $20 voucher I paid $10 for. I was there at the right time because they were significantly marking down a bunch of baby/toddler clearance items to $1.97 or $0.97. So I picked up a jacket and pjs for Emma, 2 sun hats, a batgirl onsie, and shoes (for next year) for Audrey, some 3-6 month pjs (for my gift bin), and a pair of bermuda shorts for me.
05 Crossed Wires
2106.***E-III/21/2002. On political leaders who were unwilling in their youth to risk their own lives in the military services of their country during wars they approved of. (Incorporated in Item B-14 (Projected), above, Letter C-27.)
So instead, I'm taking part in a little surprise blog hop for her.
China has extended far more domestic credit relative to GDP than other nations and has probably allocated it less wisely. With export demand falling, will China have the cash flow to bail out its insolvent banks and to rescue its state governments? Will it have to restrain its raw materials acquisition spree to deal with bad loans? Copper prices are a proxy for how well China is doing. Copper’s price move down is indicative of unwinding carry trades as well as collapse in a credit bubble in China.
Rahu and Ketu (the nodes) are smokey and hazey
I always get excited when I find a cool shaped rock that would be great as a particular animal. Like the chameleon rock above, the rock shape seemed to fit a chameleon and its curled tail so well. Surprisingly, I’ve since found another rock with a similar shape, and will eventually get to painting it. Perhaps with more color this time, to have some fun with it. The first butterfly rock that I painted happened this way; I found a triangle rock and thought, hey, this looks like a butterfly! Since then I have found quite a few triangle shaped rocks for various butterflies. There was also an elephant, a peacock, a wolf, and others. I have a few unpainted rocks like this, waiting for me to get to them. I have a Pac-man frog, a dragon, another elephant (or a buffalo, I haven’t decided yet), and a few rocks that I think would be cool with a lizard painted on them.
They jumped.........
I’m very found of style, but mine is quite regular. A few original t-shirts and eccentric flowery shirts, some sexy Bermuda shorts for the summer, that’s all.
However if the current club can hold out until the season ends Ross County will take the place of relegated Dunfermline (or conceivably Hibs). And that leaves one vacant space that the Newco would target.
I also called our Head Office for Firestone and let them know what had transpired. The man I reported to extended his sympathies, said he’d be getting some sort of complimentary newspaper subscription to put in our Customer waiting area (geez that was such a big help???) and asked, but more or less assumed, that I’d be shutting the business down now that Rob was gone.
Adding fresh herbs to any recipe add tons of flavor without adding large volumes of fat or calorie to a dish. Adding herbs at the end of cooking bring out their aromatics without burning and becoming bitter. Here's a quick guide to pair types of herbs with some dishes:
God has revealed his glory in the Word became Flesh and dwelt among us, the face of Christ. This revelation of glory contains within it the seeds of our mission. We, with unveiled faces, should reflect the glory of the Most High, Creator of all things. In order for our faces, that is our persons, to reflect to the world His glory, our faces must be turned to Christ. Not a false Christ, not an idol of our own creation or someone else’s creation, which has no glory.
And maybe this is just my own uncomfortability with emotional issues. But honestly I think that you ought to wait to have a breakdown until you’re out of a moving vehicle.
Of course, there will be a huge new 'debut novel of the year' for someone, and deals will still be being done at the London Book Fair, and at Bologna and Frankfurt. But I am not predicting a great year for writers in general, even if they are already established. All bets are going to be off as far as huge advances are concerned--especially for children's and YA books. It'll be harder than ever to get published this year, and harder still to get an agent. Sorry if this is depressing, but it's what seems to be floating around in the aether of prediction. This is the one I'd REALLY like to be wrong about.
* Restore them to an existing mobile device
I’m tired of being told that Islam is a “Religion of Peace,” when every day I
On Saturday, I went fishing with an old friend from high school. Actually, he was more my brother’s friend back-in-the-day, but given we were so close in age, more often than not, my brother’s friends were my friends and so on. As it goes, my brother, checks-in with me mid-week and asks what my plans are for the Trout Opener. I chirp back something about…well, fishing. He reminds me about the times when he and his friends would head north for Trout Camp. Ahh, yes I do remember; the legend lives on. My brother, now living in Delaware, was not able to make the trip, but he thought it would be great if I could fill-in. Of course, I agreed. I haven’t seen Jerry in a while and it might be fun to fish some different areas.
in the "Cake World". I attend every year and mark
The closure of Remploy factories will mean misery, hardship and a future of worsening health and early graves for some disabled workers who will be affected. Cuts in healthcare, benefits, and a wholesale rolling back of the welfare state will have the most devastating effect on some of the most vulnerable members of society. During the last closure of Remploy factories, some union reps had the harrowing experience of having to deal with threatened suicides by those people who felt that their world had ended and life was no longer worth living.
"Call Me Gwen-ever"
Having lived in Scotland for 9 years I was really looking forward to the Scotland 10k. Last year I was not able to run it due to a foot injury, so this was my race debut. What I was not looking forward to was the distance; 10k is my nemesis distance. I have only run a couple of 10ks before, and raced just one, the Women’s Mini 10k last year where my time was 55:37, or a pace of 8:58.
Bheem was confused but he stayed there on Krishna’s instructions. Bheem stayed in the tree all day without food and water. Bheem was getting hungry and thought that this must have been Krishna’s idea of a joke. The moon was high in the sky and Bheem thought he should go back to the palace for his meal. He looked down to start his descent but what he saw amazed him. Down below on the forest floor, thrones had been laid out like it was the court of the Gods. One by one, he saw the Devas arrive and take their seats in the court. Finally he noticed that two large thrones had been set down just below his tree. These seemed like the thrones for the persons presiding the court. Curious, Bheem decided to stay in his position at the top of the tree and witness the court of heaven.
Because I couldn’t gain access to the graveyard, I was unable to discover what the granite monolith below is or if there was anything written on it. It was, however, a strange thing to see in a graveyard.
A. It’s just as important in new media as it is in legacy media, maybe more so. Proper search engine optimization and learning how to draw audiences to articles, video, other content, is layered onto the critical roles of editing for context, for grammar, for structure, for word usage. Newspaper editors, news directors, they’re all being forced into false choices because of the audience transition to new platforms and the poor economy.
I would like to reflect a bit on the fiction parts of reality. If we are to become specialist on princesses, we should not forget the magic of reality, if there is such a distinction between the two. - What concern me, ever so much, is the fairytale aspects of the real princesses. Do they see the difference of their influential power; -to what can actually be obtained and what is the classical pure and wishful thinking? How do they cope with their limits, between fantasy and the reality, as a princess that is…
Simply that is stupid!
Her choice to fill her void with excitement beyond her Beloved has left her with filth, nakedness, regret (1:8). Deep regret – the kind where you feel swallowed by world’s darkness.
The cable says, among other observations, Pandith was shocked to find "girls as young as four years old were completely covered." The document continues: "At a local book store, texts… seemed designed to segregate Muslims from their wider community, urging women to cover themselves and remain in their homes, playing up the differences between Islam and other religions, seeking to isolate Muslims from community, and feeding hate of Jews to the young."
I am loving how this came out, and I sure hope she does too. Maybe I will get lucky and she won't peek! Have a fantastic Friday everyone! Time to go to work.
Haven’t accomplished much around here what with another new dog along with all the other excitement this past week. Our new puppy is being a puppy … but we are working with him every chance we get hoping he will grow out of the chewing and barking stage soon. Our little Sophie is confused by all the attention he gives her and spends the day trying to stay out of his way. We hope they will become fast friends when he calms down a little.
Now, to bring you all up to speed. I am now sitting in a hotel room, typing out a blog post at 1:04AM on the 28th of April in the year 2012, driving to Philadelphia and other parts of the Northeastern part of our beloved United States of America to assist in the very ministry that was fundamental in securing the foundation of my beliefs. We are now driving across the country, bringing a message of hope and peace to the lost. As I exited one mission field, I have now entered a new one. Familiar, yet foreign. But a mission field nonetheless.
I suppose the one thing I find really ironic is that there are a few people who seemingly expect a review from me when they post a story, but are not so quick to post anything when I write a story! C’est la vie, I guess? For the foreseeable future, I think its fair to say that the reviews will continue, more likely than story writing, its easier to grab time to do that. There will be the odd story, but far less than the number of reviews I churn out. There may come a time when they need to be cut back as well, but not for now.
-they briefly fight to the outside.
Then he stretched out his hand and he touched mine.
Confused by the turns of love, your lost expression
*please forgive the picture quality, my scanner was being a snatch so these are pictures of pictures.
Some administrative law judges have come under scrutiny in recent years for appearing to be too lenient.
What has happened to reading in the age of the Internet? Will the digital age put an end to the culture of reading and books that has been nurtured over centuries?
I was wondering what kind of ink I should use and I ended buying a sky blue VersaColor ink pad.. I didn't like it at all and then I came up with the idea of using my Tea Dye Distress Ink.. That's what I've been looking for..
I won't reveal my age...but when I say it out loud it sounds old...Master said it is the age inside that counts, and that is still very young. After a bithday hug, Master put the wrist and ankle cuffs on me. These are the best, they are leather, but fur lined, and just having Him put them on me, moves my mind to a very submissive place. We should use them more ofter...hint, hint. Then it was kneeling time , with Master massaging me all over, making sure I was very relaxed.
So the end of the school year is coming fast upon us and I wanted to make something for my daughter's teacher like I did last year for her other teachers, but I wasn't sure what to do. Well I came across this blog months back about doing the initial of the teacher's name with crayons. I thought it was really neat and filed it in the back of my mind for later use. Well, now is the time for later use. I used her basic concept, but did a few things differently.
Follow the instructions.
F.H.A. Scrivener’s The New Testament in Greek: According to the Text Followed in the Authorised Version Together With the Variations Adopted in the Revised Version (1881) does what it says on the tin: it provided scholars with both a faithful version of the Greek text as originally used by the translators of the Authorised Version, and extensive notes listing the changes in readings made for the Revised Version, giving the reader a fuller picture of the evolution of the translation.
Over at Come and Get It this week we have a color challenge for you. Shell was the one that chose the colors this month. very pretty colors. Anyway this is my card using the sponsor's image, Isn't she sweet. I colored her with aqua brush and inks. The flowers were originally the vanilla ones from Stampin Up, that I had left, just put them into a small bit of water with re-inker color and let them dry. Anyway the sentiment is from Happiest Birthday set, which will be gone as of the 31st of this month. You would have to host a party to get it as it is a hostess set this year.
So to get your dusk on visit these links!
In this picture, you can see My Veda Guru, Smt. Kunda Channagiri and a bit of my classmate. On the wall in the picture, is a photograph of her Veda Guru, Pujya Anakama Mara aka Sri Padmanabha Aithal. He is the Adiguru of the Sadyojatha Charitable Trust : Veda, Vedanga, Vedanta Gurukula.
Let’s Talk About the Rain is also about prejudice and discrimination. Karim delivers a searing lecture to Agathe about the way French people automatically address him and his mother Mimouna by the familiar “tu”, because they are immigrants from north Africa.
As you enter this time of praise and worship you will begin to experience a sense of the presence of the Lord. You will begin to lose your self-consciousness and you will sense that the flow of your prayers and song is coming as if from out of nowhere. In fact, as your praise increases you sense that you are uttering words that are no longer in your mother tongue. But you know in your spirit that these words are honoring God so your flow in these phrases increases. You have just received your prayer language. You are feeling so blessed, you find that you don’t want to stop. Don’t stop. Pray and sing your heart out, glorifying God!
And so God decided to create another companion for them, to remind them of their limitations. He wished to teach them that although Dog seemed to worship them, because they appeared Omnipotent and Omniscient (they often answered his prayers when he begged for a biscuit, they could open doors, and they punished him when he chewed expensive handbags), they were not in fact God.
“There is a growing international desire to be more sustainable and to live a healthier life, and a realisation that these two objectives complement each other.
Finally Carlisle who have the least chance of grabbing that last play off spot know they will have to win and hope that results go their way in two other places. They travel to Oldham who are 18th and again have very little to play for, it is possible for them to climb up to three places but that is reliant on goal difference.
With this layout I used the ranger crackle paint on the doily I had in my stash...I had never tried that before and it worked the way I had hoped! distressed, aged and cool! I also added the paint to the chipboard rocking horse and to some chipboard letters I had in my stash. I used the baby blue liquid pearls as an accent and to create a flourish. The magnificent papers I used are also from the Unicorn store, the Little Darling Collection from Graphic 45. Photo by Michelle Vink.
Guo YL, Hsu PC, Hsu CC, Lambert HH. Semen quality after prenatal exposure to polychlorinated biphenyls and dibenzofyrans. Lancet 2000; 356: 1240-1241.
Back to the classroom errr … pastry kitchen,today our group were learning how to make several dessert using Fresh Strawberries that is currently in season. Francois Pietri, the Pastry Chef himself taught us some mis en place from scratch (making tart dough, strawberry jam, strawberry coulis, vanilla custard,etc) and each of us got individual recipe and ingredients that we have to do on our own, with his directions. He was very hands on, we asked so many questions (from where to get several ingredients to what is the best oven temperature, etc.) and our baked goodies turn out fantastic.
9. Keep track of your progress and what you eat
We left Lethbridge, Alberta after shopping at Wal-Mart to restock groceries and other supplies.
fate and fortune eased in upon the wind, transcended sin,
Parents! Extremely loving, extremely cautious parents who, rather than letting their kids navigate the slide on their own, put them on their lap and let gravity do its thing. The problem is: The thing gravity is doing is breaking their childrens’ legs.
Jesse: No, no, no, don’t…don’t get out.
I have to say, it's come a long way! I love the space now. And apart from adding a skylight and installing wood flooring it is DONE! When I told people what I did, the majority told me I was nuts for ripping out thousands of dollars in upper cabinets. Well I am nuts, so niener niener.
her almost ghostly kiss
I highly recommend this series to any fan of the movies, mostly because it is just so damn cool! It adds to the Star Wars mythos, detailing much of Anakin’s training and the progression of central characters that are suddenly introduced in the movies such as Mace Windu and General Grievous.
I’ve longed so for your flamed appearance
I can’t be a perfectionist anymore.
One about the kindness of a stranger
We estimate that about half the 800 billion tons of carbondioxide put into the atmoshere by mankind since the startof the industrial revolution has been soaked up by the sea.
But did you know that you have to change your thread about every five minutes? These could take awhile.
But is the Gospel being preached?
I am really not even sure where to start. And I hate resolutions, because I have made so many in the past that only end up in failure and shame. So....here goes a try. I'm going to go back to the old stand-by of setting SMART (Specific, Measurable, Achievable, Realistic, Timely) goals. And I think I am going to set Likely, Hopeful, and Crazy.
Dr. Cable said:
Have you found that lifting two full grocery sacks has become more difficult to do than in the past? What about doing things that were once relatively easy to do? Have some of them started to tax your strength and stamina? Are they now just plain hard to do?
Welcome to the life of a hard gainer.
Okay, I jest. There is no restraining order and although I love my BJ (that sounds so bad but oh well...) I am pretty sure I would not know what to do or what to say if I ever had a chance to meet him in the flesh and not just from a distance. I'm kind of shy like that and I definitely holds me back.
Afternoon all, hope you are having a good weekend so far - it is a little bit chillier here in the east today with a bit of a bite to the wind. We have been spoiled this week so normal temperatures have come as a shock! Still, it is still a beautiful Spring day, and a good reminder what time of year it really is.
+ Available to order now for July delivery
Thanks to the anonymous readers who recently pointed out that the USPTO is now requiring acceptance of the following "Dual Use Export License Text" before submitting documents for electronic filing that were saved in "My Workspace" on EFS Web:
This is the moment that the lone blogger - unsupported by editors or subeditors - dreads. For the past five years that I have been writing this blog I have lived in horror of making this kind of misrepresentation (and in the process providing fuel for the detractors of blogging), and I can tell you that when I received William Skidelsky's friendly but questioning message I went hot and cold all over. It's why blogging is so particularly time-consuming - the need to check back and double-check, which I signally failed to do on this occasion - and why it is not always compatible with the immersive, distracting and time-consuming project of writing a novel (which is why I think I failed on this occasion).
“So finally my friend arrives and we order. I got the lasagna with meat sauce and my friend ordered the asparagus ravioli. We order, and within five minutes the food was on the table. It was hella quick. What I loved about the food was that it was real authentic Italian food. It’s not the type that you’re going to get at Olive Garden. This is the kind that you’re likely to find somewhere in Little Italy. And what I also loved is that whenever a dish came out of the kitchen, many patrons would stop talking to each other and look to see what dish it was. I know the table next to us kept looking at our food.”–Roderick A.
It is a sad twist of fate that West Bengal, the land Tagore so loved, has had to suffer under the yoke of two different dictators over the last four years. I say two dictators because after all communism is nothing but a thinly veiled dictatorship of the masses while the rule of Ms. Banerjee’s government is turning out to be a more honest and Mussolini-esque dictatorship. Whatever defenders of the Trinamool Congress and The Left have to say, it is the unfortunate truth that Tagore’s prayer remains unanswered to this date.
I'll never be able to write,
“Everything is right with this” MOJO
· Pro-Cache Library24 — making its world debut
Although this seems like a simple answer it is not always feasible because the mom who locked her kid in the car by mistake probably locked her phone in too and there may not be anyone nearby to flag down. Also in some areas there have been incidents where the authorities refuse to come out unless the kid is unconscious. I know, how uncompassionate!
On Sunday. I invite my neighbour around for cake. Now that the talented Mr F has a cookery book, he’s not afraid to use it, so we ALWAYS have cake.
Now that you have done this and gladly accepted eternal life through Jesus alone whats next?? "Present your bodies a living sacrifice, holy, acceptable unto GOD, which is your reasonable service. And be not conformed to this world: but be ye transformed by the renewing of your mind, that ye may prove what is that good, and acceptable, and perfect, will of GOD" Romans 12:1-2. This means to find yourself a Church home be in prayer about that, join a Celebrate Recovery thats a Christ centered recovery group for an hurt,habit or hang-up. Find yourself Christian friends to help you in your new walk with Jesus. Now as a Christian your dead to your sins.
Those of us who arrived early chatted while drinking coffee, before all the optimism got sucked out of us. Last month, we got notice that Medicaid provider payments due March 16 were to be delayed and that “a payment date has not been established.” Many friends in private practice, especially in rural areas where the great majority of their patients have Medicaid, have already forgone their own paychecks. Many have had to let staff go (one lost 40% of her staff this week) AND take out emergency loans. Some of the younger docs are already talking about leaving Alabama completely.
Here are the final, very simple cards. Look at how the green, while strange on the bear by itself, now pulls the bear into the paper nicely.
For now i think we’re okay. Our biggest hurdle is to get people to accept visual thinking in their day to day thinking. But still its an important development to keep our eyes open for. Maybe it even a first thought into a new graduation project? Thanks jeroen ( and roos!) for inspiring me to think!
Ok, but back to the real reason I am writing this post:
I know that they are going to make a difference for the organization,
#1) Knocking your enemies off a ledge to their deaths in PvP? Good.
Embossing
That evening on the porch shortly after finishing my Swisher Sweet Double Barrel Rum Outlaw cigar, I mentioned my second thoughts to Dooley. He patiently explained that even though I had unexpectedly connected to Paul intellectually I had failed to grasp the more important spiritual convictions of a goat. “Having been domesticated for over 10,000 years and existing as a revered sacrificial animal in a number human religious and spiritual belief systems the goat tradition finds great honor in sacrifice. To deny Paul this honor would do nothing but diminish his perception of the value of his own life. Instead, you should share your plans with Paul and celebrate his upcoming harvest as a day of joyful fulfillment.”
I heat embossed the leaf image in clear powder onto whisper white card stock. Then I placed several drops of Lucky Limeade ink into a mini mister and added a couple drops of water. I misted the corner area then blotted the excess off with a paper towel. I added a few more drops of water to the ink and sprayed again only further out into the card area. I repeated that one more time so there was a light, medium and dark progression of color.
1 echoing
and the e representing that exquisite physical value –
I love this picture because I caught the game action in the back and my dad doesn’t even care. I suppose he could hear the announcers and could easily look behind him if something tremendous happened, but for the most part, he was completely engaged with Madison.
Fair play, he cared na deils a boddle (A small coin).
In other news.. I feel like I have been running a marathon at work today. It was crazy busy for most of the day. It has been that way for the past couple of weeks. It seems that we are busy but more disorganized than anything so we are running all over the place and shouldn't be. We really need to work on getting organized in our new set up ASAP or I'm going to lose my mind. LOL I am going to talk to the pharmacist about this over the weekend.
But she did not forget her Dear Auntie. She got her a couple of lighthouse photos!
It's not easy to see, but there are two Prima chandelier jewels "hanging" to the far left. I've "drawn" their hangings in the same Stickles Gold as I did for the baubles. If you click on the photo, it'll come up bigger and you might have a better view.
So in 1993, Gonzalez's offensive WAR was 6.9. He compiled 31 Win Shares.
However, I drew my sword, and hacked at imaginary spectres all the way till I reached my sweetheart's house. I got in pale as a ghost, not a kick left in me, and the sweat was running down my fork with dread; my eyes were glassy, and I had like never to have recovered from the fit. Melissa wondered what had me out so late, and says she: "If you'd been here sooner, you might have been some help to us. A wolf came into the farm and attacked all our flocks — a regular slaughter he made. But though he escaped, he didn't get off scot free however, for our serving-man ran him through in the neck with a spear."
“I’ve got to get back to work Monday,” he said. “This is our honeymoon.”
Gripe not that nobody cares for you: You are a baby for your parents; for others you are another competitor. When everyone in this world has a burden to carry, Who wants to hear your grouse?
The cocktail hour was awesome, sushi table, mini burger table, and open bar. Ben's cousin's wedding had mini kebabs; it seems to be common to weddings on both sides of the Atlantic that cocktail hour is delicious. I think it's because the food is always mini. However, here, drinks in general seem to be more limited, just champagne and wine, maybe some beer, which is really enough. The open bar in New York was fun, but too many options! Too easy to get a killer hanger from mixing liquor with wine . . . Also, cocktail hour in France is usually the "vin d'honneur" to which many people are invited who then don't stay for dinner, like colleagues or neighbors. I haven never been to an engagement party or wedding shower here, so maybe the vin d'honneur kind of replaces that, it gives more people a chance to see the couple who wouldn't normally come to the wedding. (I know it probably comes from the small town wedding tradition, where everyone would go see you get married and then drink a toast after, and only family at the dinner. I mean in modern wedding times, it seems like a way to invite more people but still keep costs down.)
The Lord’s Prayer is Jesus’ key teaching on prayer. Let’s go through the Lord’s Prayer together.
At its busiest, I counted 17 bears at the falls or just below them. The biggest and strongest bears got the best spots, right on or in the falls, while the smaller, younger bears were relegated to slightly less desirable real estate just downstream. Each bear seemed to favour its own fishing technique, probably related to how it was taught to fish and the location of the fishing site.
His M.O., doing the mind work while watching a woman from across his seat faintly writhes and fantasize his caressing eyes, Brandon will never miss his mark even if they are already wearing a ring! To add, the competition and his goal for choosing his type has no space for compromises even for his Boss …he wants the best in every aspect of a woman and what he wants he gets! James Badge Dale (The Naked Brothers Band) is David the smart mouth, two timing family man! He maybe the Boss but here, he rather gets the booing when it comes to picking up women even Michael shakes his head when they go out just for experiencing the mediocrity he displays!
On the exercise front things are going well. I am still scaling back on the workouts as I concentrate on diet. Exercise this week included: Strength class, Spin Class, and Zumba.
“I see him as an American patriot and a whistle-blower, and I’d like his actions to be seen in that context,” Mr. Silverstein said. “What really concerned Shamai at the time was the possibility of an Israeli strike on Iran, which he thought would be damaging to both Israel and the United States.”
Messi’s ninth hat trick of the season took his league total to 46 goals, also a record and three more than Cristiano Ronaldo. The Portugal forward can added to his tally when Real Madrid visits Athletic Bilbao later Wednesday.
Dr.Stein-Keeper of the seven keys Pt.II
This is the classic view finder that is used in disposable cameras or in cheap compact cameras, it's made of two lens elements in the camera viewing window near the lens, On it is drawn a frame that define the framed scene... READ MORE
“It is under DBKL’s purview and jurisdiction. As the owner, DBKL will have to decide. It is just like — it is my house, I will decide if you can use my compound.
When GPS was used, it appears to have been effective, and we are glad to note that DSNY is going forward with our recommendation to expand the use of GPS to all snow plows. According to the DSNY official, the Queens East 8 Garage achieved a higher percentage of streets salted and plowed during the blizzard of December 2010 compared to garages in other districts that received approximately the same amount of snow. The report does identify a number of issues that require further attention such as greater planning and coordination must be in place for sensitive locations such as hospitals.
Wallpaper and fabric purveyor, Thibaut, has launched a lovely line of American-made furniture. I'm excited about it because the entire line has a classic, timeless aesthetic and from what I've read about the construction, the quality is top-notch. I also like that each piece can be customized in countless ways, so the sky is the limit in terms of style direction and color palette. Finally, Thibaut promises fast delivery. It's rare to see a 3-4 week lead time with custom furniture, so that's definitely a plus.
Have a blessed day, y'all!
We left Marzoni's at about 11:15 and drove to State College. We arrived at Otto's Pub & Brewery at 12:15 and started with a round of drinks and lunch. The Bourbon Barrel Aged Jolly Roger was still on cask, but unfortunately the Double D IPA was off tap for a few hours. After a terrific lunch, we got a tour of the brewing operations. Charlie was off premises today at a fly fishing tournament, so Nick was happy to step in for all of the questions from the students.
It must have been an O.B.E becasue I saw me push his face out of my window ( did I mention how useless my dog was at this point. My other ancient dog who was at no doubt at home sleeping in the favorite chair; would have taken off his smirking hairless face and gone for his gnads next.) grabbed his sunglasses throwing them off to the side hoping to get a chance to roll up the window.
As part of my original training period years ago, I and my fellow students undertook the challenge to live with as much awareness as we could. Honourably, living our daily lives with intention and curiosity, investigating our daily mundane rituals and habits – and changing them as a result of what we found.
Iggulden talking about what’s next for the Khan Dynasty in his best-selling Conquerer series and recipes from Jamie Oliver, Rachel Allen, Gordon Ramsay and The Hairy Bikers.
Manny and Jerry looked at one another and then fell silent, deep in thought.
Beginning of a process
Paris
can easily troubleshoot and fix things by simply pushing some other buttons.
Stamps: Papertrey Ink Everyday Button Bits
In the morning, I started my day by unmolding the cake, and then decorating the top of the cake. I didn't want to simply use cocoa powder like I did for the tiramisu cake, so my husband came up with the awesome idea to use silver dragees instead. He got the idea from a shirt that our daughter wears quite often, which is bedazzled with little studs to form the shape of Hello Kitty.
So what are we looking for ... well we definitely want trees to put our tents under, it has to be near the restrooms... for me... lol, and Chris looks at the campfire situation. We aren't really suppose to change it in any way. Of course that doesn't stop Chris from digging, smoothing, and rearranging the rocks.
I have hung the wreath on my fireplace. It looks perfect there. I love how Kim wove the pentagram with brown ribbon. The little wood shapes are cats in various seasons and poses. Purrrrfect! Also, if you look closely you can see two of my brooms, a braid of sweet grass and on the right the sweet bow and button heart that Oma Linda from OldBaggs and Stuft Shirt blog sent me a few months ago. I have received wonderful gifts from my dear blog friends. These gifts definitely add good energy to my home.
and I will prove until the end that swimming is our golden friend.
Scan through local bulletin boards
I don't think it worked for poor Sarah and Whitey as they passed away fairly quickly from unknown causes (maybe heat exposure??). It was pretty sad, but we hadn't had them that long.
For the red velvet cupcakes, I used my favorite recipe from Martha Stewart's "Cupcakes" book. Then I topped them with my favorite cream cheese frosting recipe. We decided to do half of the cupcakes with white cream cheese frosting, and the other half with pink.
Michael Anthony left the group in 2006 and was replaced by Eddie Van Halen’s son with Actress Valerie Bertinelli, Wolfgang Van Halen. He was 15 yrs old when he started playing with the band.
Drop t vinegar into warmed milk, let sit for 5-7 min. Mix 1 c flour with sugar, salt, and yeast. Stir in warmed curdled milk, prepared egg replacer, and olive oil. Beat til smooth. Set aside somewhere warm for 20 min to rise. Mix in remaining flour, olives, and caramelized onions. Turn onto a clean floured surface, and knead til smooth and elastic, 5-10 min. Add more flour to surface as necessary while kneading. Divide in 16 equal pieces. Tip: divide in half, then each half in half, and so on until there are 16 pieces. Cover pieces before shaping so they don’t dry out. Shape dough: Roll into a thin log, 10-12″ long. Tie in a knot with long ends. Wrap one of the ends underneath. Wrap other end over. Set on a greased baking sheet, and cover while shaping the rest of the rolls. Preheat oven to 375 ºF. Meanwhile, let bread rise for 15-20 min, til doubled in size. Brush tops with olive oil. Bake at 375 ºF for 15-20 min, til golden brown.
Krokowski -- psychoanalysis -- 16: "I, for one, have never in my life come across a perfectly healthy human being."
Place the dough onto baking sheet, I used 2 baking sheets and rest the dough for 45 minutes. Towards the end of rising time, preheat oven @ 180C.
For my friends, the mothers of adults: May your children grow to be they take good care of us as we grow old.
More APC per square inch than an architect's office
Will you help 80-year-old J. Dimps meet her goal of 80,000 followers?
Parents awaiting forced deportation would still be held in secure houses, but their children would be assigned minders so they can move around freely.
Residents of Kansas includes the city kansas missouri news televison and Brown Vs. the city kansas missouri news televison. There are also a number of employees if you have finalized a place that expects to win. The opportunity to dine at the Arabia Steamboat which sank in 1856, and made it to the city kansas missouri news televison in their life, in style.
Did you watch?
Happy Thanksgiving – and Love on Earth (if that’s even ever possible).
This weekend we also got a new roof, thanks to 8 non-English speaking men. When I saw them sitting in the driveway eating tacos I ran to my garden and grabbed a big bag of jalapenos and sweet banana peppers.
#15) Hot tubs & clawfoot bathtubs with candles
Here's what I started with.
Mr. Tango Collins: I am not discouraged - it is trendy for Tangueras to say no the first, second, or even third time to a Tanguero they actually really want to say yes to.
This gorgeous image is of course from The Graphics Fairy's blog - thank you Karen for all these lovely free graphics. I printed a couple of copies and cut out various bits for extra layers to add some depth. That telegraph pole looks very like a cross to me and I love the moody, Winter sky.
The advice is there to be taken.
This week only three of us could be there, so I suggested we learn something complicated to make the other classmates regret not prioritizing our dance class. Our ever-obliging instructor taught us some fancy cha-cha-cha moves. Here is how we looked after an hour:
Fast forward through the end of my first semester, Final Bell, the summer of a lifetime, and First Bell to about 3 weeks ago. I receive another e-mail from Mick. He and Julie, along with their friend Terril, were in the midst of their travels and will be in my area. We arranged for all to visit and the rest is history!
The money has been turned over to authorities.
As can be seen, the single issue views of a minority of feeble minded busybodies has been given disproportionate weight by weak and timid libraries.
work has just
#8 Refer to Lessons 1-7! ….To be cont. #Encourage, Empower, Embrace!
What Miegakure is adding to the genre isn’t a new way to play with physics, it doesn’t just expand level segments or give your character a new mix of established abilities. In a somewhat similar manner to Portal it’s meant to encourage you to think in a different manner but unlike Portal’s unique brand of problem solving, Miegakure instead focuses on your perceptions. This is a platformer that takes place in four dimensions. It’s based on a manner of viewing and interacting with the world that, as 3 dimensional beings, is completely foreign to those of us who don’t dabble in theoretical math.
I am currently working on lots of quick and easy cards. This one is for anniversaries. You can't quite see it in the picture but the butterflies and spritzed with a mixture of alcohol and Shimmer Paint.
I have combined her with the Kitschy Kitchen patterned paper line from Melissa Frances.
Numerous articles in the press have chronicled how few active managers have achieved positive alpha, performance beyond their respective benchmark. The theory goes like this, because only about 20% can achieve positive alpha the better answer is to not seek alpha at all, but to invest in passive investments that mirror an index.
Everything except the black letters are from the Bella Blvd. Tail Waggers and Cat Naps collection. Such a cute pet collection! I know the letters are a little hard to follow but the title reads 1 2 3 Strikes and Amber is out of beds. The journaling talks about how we crate Amber during the work day and how she chewed up 3 different beds. These pictures were taken just a few weeks after we got her. The first picture is when she actually broke out of her crate LOL. It's since been reinforced with metal ties so she can't escape. I have some other pictures to scrap from the day she escaped her crate. I hope to get those scrapped soon!
The reason I am writing about this is because, looking back on how I felt and the way I handled it all tells me that I need to do somethings to help myself out. I am not handling my anxiety/depression well and I think it's time I went back to someone to talk about it or get something medicinal to help me focus. At times I feel like I am weak for needing this but then other times I see that at least I can recognize the warning signs rather than letting get as bad as it got several years ago. This time I am choosing to get some help and it feels better. Hopefully soon, I will get back to feeling really good...one step at a time.
Fabulous Giggle:
Correct answers are those which agree with the information in Titanic Remembered. My decision is final!
Paper and Scissors
Prost!
Or to be more specific, he is a member of the Cabinet, a leading member of the Cabinet, which decided on and voted through the master plan put forward by Robert's erstwhile mentor, Brian Coleman, to squeeze as much money as possible out of the borough's drivers through new parking charges and cashless payment schemes.
2. Date many men at once.
Off The Map
The European Union is today an Euro-global union that fails to defend the European identity, economy and industry. Regarding the Church, its position in favor of immigrationist lobby is clear. As a Christian, I wish it were not so, but it is. There are always laudable exceptions, but the official line is to ask for open doors to immigrants.
Thanks so much Dot for allowing us into your life, even just a little.
We didn't try this until she was five or six months old, but immediately it was apparent it needed to go back. It is SO BRIGHT. She loved watching it and loved the sounds - but it definitely did not soothe her. She'd cry when it turned off. She eventually learned to turn it on herself by kicking it (probably accidentally), but if she ever flailed around in her sleep and turned it on, the extremely bright light would wake her up. Returned!
Does anyone know what is really going on in you today? You could be floundering around “big time” spiritually. Your outward actions do not expose the truth. We all must learn to believe the Spirit’s assessment of our lives…not the fleshly hogwash we tell ourselves and others.
The bee hummingbird from Cuba, the smallest bird in the world, is not only tiny — it weighs less than a U.S. penny — it’s fast, beating its wings up to 80 times a second.
Coriander leaves or Cilantro - 1/4 cup
Dominic is close, but not quite right. I hate to post anonymously, but I know what Widmer is using in this product. The "science" is franken-science. The means of gluten reduction is via the addition of enzymes, which, according to the product's documentation, "in the producing micro-organism genes naturally present in the micro-organism have been multiplied using biotechnological techniques". Using genetically manipulated products in a "craft beer" isn't what craft is all about in my book. And the gluten free community isn't one to engage blissfully with GMOs, so I'll stick with "clean" beers for now. It's unfair to credit an anonymous commenter as a source on anything, so I shot Widmer Brothers an email. Brady Walen responded this way:
I started praying really hard for God to lead me in the right direction if it be his will, and then I started writing..... This is what I came up with .... To my good friend Monica with love..May God Bless and keep you with his comforting peace as only he can....Susie
Eric Bana is Mark "Chopper" Read, real-life convict and bestselling author of "How to Shoot Friends and Influence People." His story is frightening, savagely funny and twisted. The son of a devoutly religious mother and a one-time soldier with a fondness for sleeping alongside a loaded gun, Chopper dreams of making a name for himself as a legendary crime figure. His journey starts out as a wisecracking criminal failure, inside a maximum-security prison, but he manages to twist his life into a fascinating and wickedly funny take that the press and the public can't get enough of.
Short, a bit stubby.
Charlton Heston expressed interest in playing Chief Brody, but Spielberg thought he would have overshadowed the other actors, and the shark.
This is a theoretically "big" beer from a Petaluma, CA brewer who probably deserve a bit more respect than they typically get - they've earned mine in spades on the basis of beers like IMPERIAL RED, MAXIMUS, their PILS, etc.. I'm not convinced respect is necessarily earned on this one, however. LAGUNITAS BROWN SHUGGA is nearly 10% in alcohol, and fits into no true discernable style. "Strong ale" is what these boys are going for, and in terms of approachability and drinkability, they've done very well for themselves.
Olive, The Other Reindeer ... the CW ... 9 PM
Today it doesn't matter that I forgot to bring the aforementioned hair flowers with me. I can buy more or steal them from people's gardens.
We bought three canvas drawers to hold Calvin's clothes. We mounted the bottom drawer quite a bit off the floor because most of the toys needed to be at kid-level. Remember, I wanted to jam as much of Calvin's belongings in the closet as possible. But I also wanted him to be able to access most of his toys himself. Because the vertical rails go to the floor, though, as time goes on, the closet can change. Meaning, when plastic baby toys are no longer loved and needed, more drawers can be added, or maybe an in-closet desk situation could be set up, or whathaveyou. See all the holes in the vertical rails? That's where the brackets fit in... the configuration possibilities are endless because you can move the brackets or other components.
So, basically, I’ve just added two more projects to my already-crowded summer to-do list. That’s two novels to edit/rewrite, at least three cowritten projects lined up (only one of which we really intend to get done over the summer – the others can wait), and two scripts to finish. Fortunately one of them is also collaborative. The other one, though… not only does it need to be written all the way through, it’ll also need some serious revising. Oh, and I’ll have four stories of the month to do.
BACKER H. Counterpoint: in favour of mandatory influenza vaccine for all health care workers. Clin Infect Dis 2006; 2: 1144-1147.
The blazer pictured here is not one of the new ones, nor one of the treasures found at the Re-Sale Shop. It is one that my daughter, Jen, bought…new…a long time ago…when this look was stylish. She gave it to me more than ten years ago. It’s obviously seen a bit of wear. It has snags and tears from being worn on my walks through blackberry brambles. The elbows are worn; the lining is torn. Still, it’s a nice jacket to throw on as an extra layer, when looks don’t matter. Turns out, it still manages to dress up a look, in a pinch.
With these cyber attacks and the Bersih 2.0 rally on July 9, the government
Some might think, What’s the big deal? or Pati ba un prinoblema? So what? So what if women are made to sit differently? I throw that question back to you. What’s the big deal with women sitting with their legs open? If a woman is wearing a skirt, then I’d understand that she wouldn’t want to flash her underwear in public, but why does the same rule stand when she is wearing pants? Why isn’t she allowed to sit back and relax the way that men do? I mean, who made this Wag-ka-bumukaka-only-for-women rule? Why are we not allowed to sit the way we want to sit without being chastised as unladylike?
I did it. I deleted my Facebook and Twitter accounts. I can breathe again, having removed myself from the emptiness of all that nonsense. I wasn’t in the middle of any drama, I’m just tired of the worthlessness of everything that is shared there. Honestly. Go get a life, people! This is not a new argument, it’s just mine right now.
Words.
A proposed amendment “allows for judicial review of the home minister’s decision to grant, refuse, revoke or suspend a permit”.
My thoughts and opinions about Doonesbury were pretty well-covered when I wrote about the very first collection of strips, Still A Few Bugs in the System. This particular presentation of the Doonesbury strips are the ones I’m most familiar with, the books being about double the size of the way newspaper comic strips were being collected at the time.
. . . The Poster King at the Estorick Collection in Islington – I hadn't heard of it either! The way I found out about this exhibition is a long story, I'll tell you a brief version, one day earlier this year, I received an email which wasn't meant for me but I recognised the name of the sender – it was a gentleman, with a very distinctive name, whom I'd interviewed for my final year art history project at art college! I decided to let him know his email had gone astray and after exchanging further emails, I admitted that I had regretted my choice of subject for the project and wished I'd continued my 2nd year studies about the work of Edward McKnight Kauffer. A month or so passed and I received another email from him, telling me that there was a major exhibition of McKnight Kauffer's work in London this autumn and he hoped I'd be able to go along to see it!
I will be working, a lot of my job can be done on email and the phone, and will do enough to get by without attracting criticism from my boss.
Thinking about the amount of defenders we’ve gone through this season, it wouldn’t be unreasonable for one of our midfielders to think twice about vacating a space to press the ball if he’s not familiar with the people behind him.
years later, my parents – before my mom left – would convince themselves that derek had been the bad one. the one to transform me from a happy child to a depressed, angry layabout. i wish they had been right. that would have been a great start on my road to well-being. i wish i could tell them that derek had saved my life, before i had any idea how fucking awful life could get.
Spreading upwards to the skies,
Karin
AMDG
So, as is my wont, I have drawn up a plan – my knitting and crochet plan for how to StashDown and LaceUp in 2012. It is based on
In this release major changes have been made to the infrastructure used by KDE on Windows: As in previous releases since KDE 4.3.1, support for the mingw version 3 compiler has been discontinued. This Release is based on the stable 4.6.0 version of Qt instead of version 4.5.2. Applications from previous 4.3.X releases should be compatible with this release. This release also includes an unstable version of the koffice release 2.1.0.
each one of my greetings fell flat
It was a great 1st 5k hosted event. The runners were friendly and had a great time. They said that they look forward to the next one. They really love the cause that they were supporting.
I kept telling them it was the feed - I'd had it once before and spent 24 hours vomiting non stop - but they were still adamant they knew best "Just try one more night Susan..."
But the government is not interested in holding the dollar… For the dollar is not wealth. Of course it has a few for petty cash!
Hope all is well with you. Thanks for remembering me and stopping by.
"This is the weirdest case I've ever seen," said police Chief Ben McBride.
Participants: Jeremy Gilbert (chair) Dhanveer Brar, Adam Harper, Matthew Prichard, Barry Shank, Jason Toynbee
What are your thoughts on a dark vs. light bedroom?
Lime Juice - 3 - 4 drops
lemon juice/vinegar 1/2 cup
Oh come down, Red Molly to his dying bedside"
Intercessory Prayer can be in the morning, in the afternoon or before you go to bed at night. God knows your heart and He know the hearts of the people you are praying for and about.
So if you want to keep up to date with everything Tillt! related, all you need to do is tune into Fear FM on the first Thursday of every month, or Q-Dance Radio every first friday of the month, relax, and crank the volume!
You may completely system, or re-application your thoughts, to attain something you motivation and also have good results in all parts of living. You might get incredible outcomes once you start to implement this application. With ZOX Human brain Coaching you are going to have unlimited ability to build the living you’ve usually needed, and more quickly than it is possible to envision.
Mark Oxner: Alan Grayson calls himself a proud progressive. But what does this mean?
Look, I know you don’t like the plan that we had. I don’t like the Obama plan. His plan cuts Medicare by $500 billion. We didn’t, of course, touch anything like that. He raises taxes by $500 billion. We didn’t do that.
Spanish Festivals and Traditions is an invaluable, time-saving book, providing intercultural ideas for every month of the year. For each festival and tradition you will find background information, key vocabulary, detailed lists of possible teaching activities and optional age-appropriate photocopiable sheets.
“German troops are approaching Paris at a rapid pace. As we speak, the vanguard is reported to be fifteen kilometers from Versailles. This will be our last broadcast for a while.”
What about the Howells’ son Thirsty, who wants his father out of the way so that he can take over the Howell oil business?
I know that a lot of people just come and go but some people stayed with me from the very start till now and I hope that they will stay even more. I don’t know all of my subscribers but I know quite a lot and when they say good words about my blog posts or some creative stuff I do my heart fills with soft little bubbles and I look like that:
6:00 pm Cracker
Some old photos, taken in finland in august.. it wasn't so much about what I wore but I wanted to capture the last minutes of the pm sun and the unexplained feeling of ease and happiness that I strangely felt that day..
Prevent Leaks:
boy! talk about stress!!!! i didn't feel this stressed when hubby was sick and died! i feel like taffy being pulled from every end. sheesh! ok. here's the results.....
Ta ta for now
Test yourself with this multiple choice quiz.
Congratulations Anne-Marie!! Contact me at the address on the side bar to claim your 7 digi images for Bugaboo.
your words no longer speak.
If I can say one thing is for sure, Ukrainians know how to celebrate Graduation. It definitely lived up to all of the hype that everyone gave it the past couple of weeks.
- used .5kg of mince/beef to make a Cheeseburger and Fries casserole (recipe to follow)
Ukrainian Beef and Beet Borscht; Potato Pirozhki
My second, and more successful offering, was my go-to, ‘signature’ recipe of Paula Deen’s grandma heirs carrot cake with a basic cream cheese frosting. Those went a LOT better than the banana ones and disappeared twice as fast! (can you believe I didn’t take pictures of my offerings?! *gasp*)
Using emergency powered radios and working with local agencies, the hams will have only a few hours to create extensive radio communication networks which can be used should there be a failure or overload of normal services. The hams' ability to get back "on the air" quickly is critical following major incidents. In addition, the ham radio operators provide "interoperability". This means they can pass information between the many government and volunteer agencies which are needed in disasters but often have incompatible communication systems.
Adviser: Wow. Okay. Um. Okay.
Chelsea, Matt, and I put together and handed in the final proposal, wrapping up our non-profit work with Gail and the Shelter. We proposed that Cat’s Cradle send out a call for volunteers on their Facebook page. Gail said that she already had someone in mind to take over Chelsea’s Twitter duties, which is cool.
The only solace I can take is in the fact that my intelligence cannot be measured by a peace of paper I got for doing my homework for four years.
I'm just glad someone missed me.
Thanks for stopping by, hope you'll join us this week!
Now is the time to reach out to anyone sitting on the fence, unsure about the propaganda and indoctrination they are exposed to in our schools, our colleges and our media. Please share these videos. We need more panels like the Islamic Apartheid Conference and please support these brave student leaders.
There’s a woman who’s down there with too much time on her hands
Evonik’s comments came on the same day major automakers and auto suppliers met in suburban Detroit to discuss ways to keep auto production up during the acute shortage of PA-12.
At UNISON Conference in Bournemouth Dave Prentis pledged support for national strike action against an attack on our pensions. I imagine he was expecting such an attack emerging several months into the life of the Coalition Government , rather than several weeks.
People using the RFID wristbands at the event could take pictures and post them on their Facebook wall, win prizes and also support the Surf Insertion association with “Likes” i.e. 100 check-ins collected one surfing lesson.
Notes from the show:
you see
We doubt Your goodness, we doubt Your love
So, to sum up, people got together, chatted, laughed, enjoyed a wonderful meal and took home a great book in a pretty little parcel and hopefully had a memorable evening.
painted toes
Ultimately, I walked away with only three purchases. (haha) I found some wonderful books for our study of early American history – one of which is a part of a series I’ve been collecting. Yay, Homeschool Library Builder! : ) The purchasing was a breeze and the books arrived in just a few days in the condition they were described. I will definitely keep my eye on the selections available at HSLB and continue purchasing from them.
Concern was growing last night over the well being of the students involved in the attack on Prince Charles' limo during the tuition fee riots earlier this week.
And then…. There was DINNER. Sadly for someone who used to take photographs of food professionally, there is no excuse for what follows, out of focus, low light, and just overall bad composition, but I’m going to post it anyway because this isn’t a photo blog (yet).
Fine Again
Ordering Information:
That you should always leave loved ones with Loving words.
O, the pressure. As much fun it is to go beer shopping, this time I felt pressure. This was big time. This wasn't a usual trade. This was a trade with a real beer guy. A man who knows his beer. My reputation was on the line. I needed to do it right.
Financial Management: Building a Strong Bottom Line
Young @ Heart – “Fix You”
This semester I went through a phase were I was into watching The Gilmore Girls. Every night after I would watch a few episodes and I wanted to reflect on this in my blog. The focus of Flashback: Gilmore Girls Season One was on how this show is real to life (to an extent) and is relatable for girls who are in the process of growing up. Overall in this post I want to convey how it important it is to have shows like this that focus on healthy mother daughter relationships, rather than all the drama on TV today. Overall, this is one of my favorite posts.
To an innocent bystander our laughter was probably lame. Maybe even a bit inappropriate. Perhaps even on the politically incorrect side.. most certainly, absolutely stupid to most. But to us, our repartee was funny; hysterical even.
Miss Olivia and I took a break from our crocheting this morning to make a softie to contribute to Christy's fabulous 'Softies for Smiles' drive.
And, as mentioned, that conception of conservatism shows in Bush's policies too. Many conservatives were totally appalled at the way he expanded the size of the U.S. government -- first with post 9/11 security measures and then with the prescription drug benefit for seniors. Where did the Reagan cutback mentality that launched America's long economic boom go?
67. Go camping
6. Chili powder, 1 teaspoon. (optional).
The most recent (horrible) I’ve found is in a guest post on Friends Dating Places. Before I go further, remember that this is a guest post on the site and may not necessarily express the views of the site as a whole. Also, in the marketplace of ideas, everyone is entitled to their own opinion. My opinion is that Ask Robby G is abhorrently erred in his dating advice.
Her action scene comes at the start of the movie. At a SHIELD facility where Er. Erik Selvig (Stellan Skarsgård) is working on the Tesseract, the cosmic cube flips out, Loki shows up, turns Hawkeye and Selvig into mind-controlled puppets, and steals the Tesseract as the SHIELD facility start collapsing. Just prior to Loki showing up, Fury sends Hill off to another part of the facility, so she’s not there for all the fun, but then when Hawkeye is driving the getaway vehicle, Hill shows back up to have a car chase down a tunnel.
It’s a funny place, Wakefield. Has the feel of a run-down old northern industrial town – which it is – but has little gems of culture and community, which are well worth a look if you can see past the ugly 1960s roads, underpasses and buildings.
“Well, let’s get a ladder and get up on that roof and see what’s going on.”
and are buoyed away by air
The storm is raging and rain is pouring down on Jack and MIB/Locke, who literally have a physical showdown on the cliff. It was like watching two Gladiators fight to the death!
Esther
This app gives you lots of different dinosaur puzzles to solve. The only thing is that you could do them all and then run out of puzzles to solve. Good for the first half of the Kindergarten year.
I skipped in a blush as the big girls rolled
So come find me while I'm happy and wandering. I love being lost and gallivanting aimlessly with friends most of all! I'm a helluva good straggler, lots of fun while I'm lost! Perhaps especially while I'm lost!
-Bottles are counter-pressure filled to ensure a more stable shelf life but we still encourage you to keep them cold and drink them sooner than later.
Everyone's talking about Karen's forthcoming role playing Jean Shrimpton in a dramatisation of her affair with photographer David Bailey - We'll Take Manhattan airs this month on BBC4.
2. God And The Devil (Christiansen, v. d. Knaap, Buschman) 2:27
If all the world were music,
Tonight I was given a prominent reminder of God’s unique and amazing ability to create beauty from ashes in the form of a text message. The text message was from my birth daughter, out of the blue, thanking me for giving her life, and telling me that she loves me. She is my ever glowing rainbow as a result of that long ago storm. A time when I thought for certain I would drown — now radiantly beautiful.
Level 27: Recovers 270 HP and 81 MP every 4 seconds.
So let’s not allow ourselves to get fatigued doing good. At the right time we will harvest a good crop if we don’t give up, or quit. Right now, therefore, every time we get the chance, let us work for the benefit of all, starting with the people closest to us in the community of faith (Galatians 6:9-10 MSG).
below the Elf
When Saint Peter came by, the woman said to him, "This is such a wonderful place! How do I get in?"
It started in August, the letter a was giving me a hard time. I couldn’t use it, ended up sending mess’ey’ges like this so the person I w’ey’s spe’ey’king with could underst’ey’nd wh’ey’t I w’ey’s s’ey’ying. Then it goes on and off. Last September the delete button started having issues. So I resorted to sending voice notes instead of typing. I have endured these issues for over four months, being the busy person that I am I had no time to have my phone checked and I highly doubt that the warranty would still cover it since the phone was purchased in Canada. But wait, those stuck-up-keys issues are just tiny hiccups compared to the new problem my phone’s giving me. NOW ALL THE KEYS ARE NOT WORKING. You can only scroll, that’s it. Amazing, I know.
SUBJECT: Fire hydrant
Escape from Camp 14, Blaine Harden
J E T S ~ Just Enough To Succeed?
On our local common we have been unable to take away grass clippings but we’ve still achieved a huge increase in flowering plants just by changing when the area is mowed.
Germany's federal prosecutor was asked in November 2006 to pursue a case against Donald Rumsfeld, the former defence secretary, Gonzales and other officials for abuses committed in Guantánamo Bay and Abu Ghraib prison in Iraq. But the prosecutor declined on the grounds that the issue should be investigated in the US.
1. There are people in the world who do not and never will have access to a book, and certainly not to technology capable of reading or writing ebooks. Remember that when you think of a technology or a book being "for everybody." And remember that many who will never see a book may have a richer storytelling life than us.
The clinc escorts caught up with Tori, but she walked right by them. She headed straight for the garbage can in front of the clinic and vomited into it. One of them handed her a Kleenex to wipe her mouth.
4. Cover them once more with about 3 inches of water. Peel onions, chop in quarters, toss in pot. Peel garlic, toss in pot. Add cumin. Set crock pot on low for 10 hours, walk away.
I know what you’re going to say: if that’s true, then why did they bring the Aliens to the South Pole for training exercises? But that’s not the right question. The question is: why did they bury everything at the South Pole under a thousand tons of ice? See, I think they brought the aliens to earth to STUDY them (assuming they didn’t just find them here already – Prometheus may have something to say about where the “jockey” came from – there were giants in the old days, people), then one day they discovered humans. Being gentle creatures and not wanting to kill the alien queen, they froze her and buried her deep under the ice so she couldn’t harm humans until they could find a way to safely extract her. By the time they had done that, they realized that the alien was not only dangerous to humans, but so were the humans themselves. This amazing new species was on the verge of wiping itself out. The solution is to become invisible and watch from the sidelines, and interfere when it became necessary. Sometimes they could be subtle, other times, they needed a nuclear bomb (hence Sodom and Gomorrah).
"Manuel could be perfectly happy and here I am, still an angry and bitter man. I didn't want to be that kind of person," I continued. "So I let go. And the irony is, it is when we let go that we truly become free."
Apparently the event I described earlier as a “watershed” was the first in a string of events that I personally will be passing through. But not only me. Evidently, many of you will as well.
2.) Let her out of the house and be free! We arent too worried about her - she's proven herself able to escape for 24 hours, play with bunny's and birds all while frolicking in the field safe as can be...(just kidding hehe)
Said, "He was out of line girl
There is no other way to heaven. There is no existence of other gods. And, there is no other eternal life to imagine. It is only through faith in what Jesus did for us on the cross that we can be saved unto eternal life. The salvation we receive through faith in Christ Jesus is too great a gift to be squandered on the so-called gods of this world. We cannot afford to lose our salvation by running after myths.
Now, go forth and buy cast iron! Next time you need a pan, please consider it. You won’t regret it. Hell, your grandmother probably has a ton of spares you could swipe. And if she happens to have a waffle iron, do send it my way! It seems they’ve never existed in New Zealand – we only get those horrid electric things.
The subsequent chapters then go into much greater details on the ingredients, procedures, chemistry and science behind Sake brewing. For example, you will find a brief history of rice growing, not only in Japan but also in the U.S. and Australia. There is a large section on moto, yeast starter, production with information and procedures for five different systems. You will find multiple comparisons between commercial brewing and home brewing, indicating changes that the home brewer likely may have to make. Chemistry lessons play a part, and some of the information can get very technical.
When Brown says that he left to make room for the next generation of leaders, who no doubt have their own aspirations and a list of things they want to achieve, you can take the man at his word. There's no need to second-guess, tea-leaf read, or additionally construe actual motivations as there is in the case of the leader of one of the major parties leaving. It's not about factional deals. It's not about preserving a legacy. It's not even about making sure a particular piece of legislation gets up in the House. When Brown says that one of the bad things about a strong leader is that he or she stands in the way of the aspirations of others, you can take him at his word. Brown can smile so broadly, as he does in this photo, because he's being completely honest. He's not trying to keep his legacy intact by appeasing someone else's hunger for power.
But then one mysterious day about two years ago, my taste buds did a 180. I didn’t gag when a cilantro leaf made its way across my tongue. It was an unfamiliar flavor, for sure, but… did I like it?
I was in Chicago last week giving two seminars at the IWCE Visions Window Expo - which went really well I think! - and wandering the booths at KBIS, the Kitchen & Bath Industry Show. More to come on those - I'm still working on my photos. But, on the third day, I did some serious sight seeing. It was my first time in Chi-town and it certainly lived up to its reputation of being a fantastic city. The architecture, the popcorn, the pizza, the public art - and Marilyn? Not even locals can explain the enormous Marilyn near the Chicago Tribune building. This view from the top of the double-decker bus.
Wipe the drool away. I'm not a tease. Unless you are a cute man at the bar. No, this is no tease. This is a dream of you, me and the next person, and I my friends, am making it come true. I don't have many people in my life. No friends on my speed dial, no family within 100 miles, and a relationship that's more sour than sweet. So when the holidays come around, Valentine's, or even a lazy Sunday...I know there will be no surprise waiting for me. Unless, of course, I get something for myself. Which is nothing to be ashamed of! I am constantly perusing the markets, gift shops, browsing irresponsibly online, hoping to come across a hidden gem I can call my own. But to be honest, sometimes its tiring. Do you ever feel that way? There are millions of treats in this world, and its your job to find them all. Ugghhh. Someone just throw me a brownie and let's be done with it. So dolls, I present to you my baby. My latest project I've been toiling away at for months. The Black Box Dessert Club. A club for the rest of us.
08.Bad Attitude
This dress is a favorite of mine, and I continue to stitch and embellish it as time goes by. When I have time, I like to sit on and stitch and think, continuing to add beads and other elements at my whim. I think of it as a work in progress; and with each stitch, it just beomes more beautiful.
I just don't understand how anyone can go through the psychological classes, all the testing, and the surgery (including the pain afterwards), basically being on a liquid to soft food diet for almost two months and spend almost $30k (depending on your insurance coverage) and not at least make an attempt to follow-up on everything you've just gone through. It's one thing to go on a diet and maybe not follow through with that...this is something completely different. I understand that the surgery is just a tool to help you, but it's a MAJOR life-changing tool!
The play is about a struggle, a struggle of ideas and a struggle of personalities. Toby Stephens plays Georges Danton, in some ways the Lenin of the French Revolution. But unlike Lenin Danton was no puritan; life was for living, and living was to enjoy the good things of life, no matter how they happen to come to one.
let me be the fire that makes your eyes sparkle when
2. Sunny Sundae Smile
So I was delighted when I discovered that 'The Education of Hyman Kaplan' (or H*y*m*a*n K*a*p*l*a*n, as he calls himself) had been reprinted recently and was available at the Book Depository. This book is about a (fictional) adult education class for foreigners wanting to learn English, set in the US in 1937.
Started off by inviting long forgotten blues artists like Howling Wolf and John Lee Hooker to play at his college in the early 60s. Became European tour manager for US blues and jazz musicians. Was stage manager at the 1965 Newport Folk festival when Dylan went electric and changed folk music forever. Became UK A&R man for Elektra Records and signed the Incredible String Band. Opened the first underground music venue UFO where the house band was Pink Floyd. Produced Pink Floyd's first single. Discovered Fairport Convention and Richard Thompson. Single handedly created English Folk Rock. Discovered Nick Drake and Vashti Bunyan. Went into films and produced the soundtrack to "Deliverance". "Duelling banjos" is his only number 1, but he hated it so much he refused to have his name on the credits. And on and on.
Since I still hadn’t gotten a chance to calibrate my Nike + yet, I went to Map My Run, a very accurate “Google maps” type system that helps people plan out running and biking routes, to get an idea of what my distance and pace actually was.
Mattress… Yes, I bought a mattress, an expensive one at that.
First was the church school, we liked the feel of it; lots of happy kids, loads of wonderful art on the walls and a great assembly with prayers and hymns. But there were two things which felt weird;
She wouldn't budge. It was a Mexican stand off. That devolved into a 15 minute temper tantrum....by her, not me - let's be clear about this.
Script 2
we can’t let it stress us
Since the paperback edition has a preface dated 2011, it is reasonable to assume that, whatever else he may have revised or modified, Hitchens stands by that silly, misleading, and completely unworthy metaphor.
£3.00 concessions (students / unemployed)
November 11 Austin, TX Stubb’s Waller Creek Amphitheatre
Put all the ingredients in the crockpot and cook for 4 hours on high or 8 hours on low. Enjoy!
Mark: What is THAT?
All righty, folks...
First, run the garlic clove through a mini food processor. Then, add the rest of the ingredients (except for herbs) and run until it’s completely emulsified. Now add herbs and run until minced.
We’re not drowning in Union Jacks here in the UK just yet, (well no more than usual) but the Queen’s Diamond Jubilee year is now officially underway.
After 38 years of providing the campus and surrounding communities with a one-of-a-kind dining experience, Triton College’s Hospitality Industry Administration (HIA) Dining Room needs an exciting name, and the college is looking to the community for suggestions!
MAGOEBASKLOOF: Elderly woman stabbed with knife on her farm.
We have done this once before and it was great fun, so we hope you'll enjoy it again.
I know, all too well, that when these feel-good stories come along, that there is often little I can really say. Videos of the individuals being facilitated are often cut so that you cannot see what the person is typing at the time, or how the facilitator is positioned. But occasionally you get lucky, and you can, if you know what you're looking for, see the elbow cupped, or my favorite, the facilitator holding one end of a stick while the client holds the other; boy, the typing is fast then. Even more obvious are some videos you can find on youtube of a child being restrained as he tries to run away, as he independently speaks, and while the parent holds that arm and the typing continues. Paid facilitators would tell you (and do) that this is the genuine communication: the typed communication, not the spoken. See, there's a disconnect between the autistic person's speech and thoughts, too. Not only are the fine motor skills impaired, so is the speech, so that the only way the person can genuinely communicate is when the facilitator helps.
And, this blog post is short because I kind of feel like I am running around a bit like a chicken with my head cut off, but it’s all good.
10 hours Cost: $89.00
Never looks back,
Anyway, win some, lose some and we will await our next arrival in the post.
It was a very easy read – I read it in 2 sittings – and I would highly recommend that you make this one of the books you read this year!
Actually, a little more than slightly.
“Because we’re dumb,” Jaroch said. “We’re trying to do the right thing by people. The SEC in early October called us in and said we know we just leased 900,000 square feet from you just a few months ago, but now we only need the southwest quadrant.”
pearls, gems from stash
Where you've walked out all alone
Page 77:
1 lawdy
1 x (3249)Kimball Kidney Bean = 3.75
My other problem was the crying heroine. Jeeze! She cried every other page.
You tell me it's the institution
As far as a weekend update, I don’t have much to report. It was HOT here, and I stayed inside in the AC and got lots of much-needed grading done. I got some walks and gardening in, and I got all my grocery shopping done for the week. Prepared and ready for the week. I’m looking forward to being out and about more next weekend, because it’s overdue.
not only in terms of my own experience
The Urologists were pissed off at the whole idea.
$26.00 Lawn Ticket Available – May 7 – Day of Show
I should note that in addition to the large number of people on the trail, you will also periodically encounter houses that appear next to the trail during a section that begins at about the 1.7 mark and lasts roughly for the next half mile. I found these houses less intrusive than you might expect; some of the backyards even have a vaguely park-like quality to them.
No more wounded hearts
Now, it doesn't take a special occasion to get a cake out of me, but I knew they'd be getting a cake immediately when he followed up his cake observations by saying they had something to tell us...
Even to give every man according to his ways, According to the fruit of his doings. This is HUGE! What if I am being given life circumstances according to my ways? What has been my way? Have been a wife according to my way or God’s way? What is the fruit of my doings? Have I spent time seeking God for his response to these feelings of heartache?
however nowadays, dresses, tops, skirts, are becoming more see-through and sometimes senteng tak cukup kain.
The biggest message here is to look to your own community and become involved in supporting issues that have a direct relationship to your daily life. You really can’t fix anything out there in the world without looking to self and your immediate environment first. That is where your bids for power and commitments to those bids will have the greatest impact.
This morning as I sat quietly the following words came to me and I am hopeful I can begin to live them.
Common acclaim decided that the cat was, indeed, the cat’s whiskers, and a chocolate egg was duly awarded. Slightly embarrassing as a first timer, but shows that we’re entering into the spirit of things and trying.
Do you recall that song that Ginger Rogers and Fred Astaire sing in “Shall We Dance?” You know, the one where they waltz around/tap dance on roller skates and decide they should end everything because one calls that starchy vegetable from the ground “po-tay-toe” and the other one claims it’s “pa-tot-oh?”
Little did I know as I wrote my second cookbook, happily creating recipes for lemon infused pasta primavera and olive-rosemary focaccia, that a hidden twist in my own eclectic heritage would soon disrupt my life. After years of subtle symptoms, an acute phase produced a twenty pound weight loss, joint pain, skin rash, and malabsorption. By December, 2001, I knew I had celiac disease.
BIOS : 5.2-0 (15825)
“We were elated. We had only read about the armed peasant struggles in China and Vietnam. Now it was actually happening here in our land,” says Rai Chaudhuri. Soon posters supporting Naxalbari started to appear in College Street and elsewhere .Slogans such as ‘China’s Chairman is our Chairman’ suddenly sprouted on Kolkata walls. The lawns of Presidency College became a meeting ground for students from Calcutta and neighboring areas, and the informal group came to be known as the Presidency Coalition
Peach Cobbler
And Santorum, who kept saying Obama needs to be beaten and was told by a reporter “That sounds like an endorsement for Romney.” Santorum said, “…if you take it that way.”
Both contenders tend to oversaturate colors (particularly green), but the Galaxy S III comes a little closer to reality.
The people of the community who live in the area around Atlantic Yards and who oppose Atlantic Yards have been asking for more streets to be inserted into the street grid at the site instead of fewer, just as street are reinserted at the redeveloped World Trade Center site. That is exactly what has been called for by the community’s UNITY Plan. If when it comes to the Trade Center site Ms. Burden believes "We need our streets, we need connectivity, . . for light and air and to create normal blocks," and believes “measures should be taken to more fully integrate the site into its surroundings with regard to streets, sidewalks, pedestrian flow, public open space and urban design.. . “ that “critical to the successful integration of the site . .” is that “streets be extended as real streets . . .designed to accommodate both vehicular and pedestrian use” and that “the public realm in New York is primarily composed of streets and sidewalks” why can’t Ms. Burden support the Atlantic Yards neighborhood community when it makes this case?
Tallgrass by Sandra Dallas is a story told through the eyes of young Rennie a13 year old girl. How Rennie's family and a Japanese family lives intersect after an internment camp is set up near their home. You learn a bit about what interment was like. You explore along with Rennie the morality of it all.
So, we obviously have a snail problem and clearly we aren't solving it by dropping them into our bucket of ammonia water (a remedy I read about on the Internet). Anyone have any ideas on how we can better control snails? It has to be something pet-friendly since Gromit likes to put them in his mouth.
Aside his solo works, PETIT is active in Strings Of Consciousness, does a duo with Lydia Lunch, and his collab with James Johnston (Gallon Drunk/Bad Seeds/Faust) just appeared on Dirter Promotions.
Stir the yellow icing gently with a rubber spatula to break any bubbles on the surface and transfer to a squeeze bottle. Fill in the rose with the thinned, flood icing.
Alright! Enough already! You. Nay-sayer. Out! I am officially evicting you. Pack your sad little suitcase and get out of my head. Go on. Shoo!
For both Batman and Dexter it’s more than just having likable qualities or vulnerabilities that make them anti-heroes. They do things that don’t quite fit into the norm of what is expected for a hero, but I think that if their personal experiences had been different, if their worlds had changed early on, they could be true heroes.
Have a sweet day.
Self-Sufficiency: An album of music so outstanding that it stands out amongst its peers (Nirvana’s Nevermind springs to mind instantly) has a certain uncompromising independence about it. Paintings by iconoclasts like Vincent Van Gogh or Claude Monet needed no others for comparison and stand peerless. A book with its own point of view of set in a unique place or time (Hitch Hiker’s Guide to the Galaxy, for example) can be thought of as self-sufficient. A software application that does everything you need it to do, which needs no other application (Photoshop might be an example) and which becomes ubiquitous also has the property of self-sufficiency.
This is extraordinarily significant.
- Jamie from My Baking Addiction suggested putting the springform pan in an oven bag to ensure no water gets in. I’ve had these turkey sized oven bags in my pantry for YEARS, so I tried it, and with the bag protecting the pan, I was able to bring the water bath higher up the sides than I would with just foil.
I may be stepping out of the theological box by saying what I have in this post about the Eucharist, but I don’t think so. Jesus does not want us to hide our faith or what God is doing in and through us. Jesus wants us to let our light shine and to remain salty so that the whole world, that everyone will see God through us and will come running to see that God is good. We are to beacons of God’s light, love, joy, and hope for a world gone and going mad. When Jesus says, “Do this in remembrance of me,” Jesus is telling us to live in remembrance of him as much as he is saying break the bread, drink the wine in remembrance of Him.
"For women and girls, this is a struggle not to be assaulted, raped, molested or forced into the commercial sex trade." He said up to 70% of women experience violence in their lifetime, however, given that most violence is unreported, that figure would be a gross underestimate.
Take technology billionaire Bill Gates who backed Sapphire Energy, an algae start-up based in San Diego. Gates now has a distinct interest into using the power of pond scum to replace fossil fuels, quite possibly not unlike his legendary hiring practices of substituting cheap workers for educated Americans. In 2008, Bruce Bigelow at Xconomy reported that Gates backed the alternative fuels company which didn't at the time want to “get caught up into the hype”:
With no response from Cardinal Ratzinger, Archbishop Weakland wrote a different Vatican office in March 1997 saying the matter was urgent because a lawyer was preparing to sue, the case could become public and “true scandal in the future seems very possible.”
Now, I don’t believe that every person should go to college. Some people are not cut out for it and they would prefer to do jobs that don’t require a college degree. But they will still usually need some sort of training or education in order to find a job that will allow them to live above the poverty line. While that is not true in all cases, it is true in many.
“Once there was a little boy, who didn’t want anyone to play with any of his toys”
"I trust You. Take it all; if You want."
9. Do you like to exercise? Nooooo!!!!
But they recognized those "claw" feet and
Computing NFL Degrees
The new media, including news portals and blogs like HU, have opened up information and debate, and the PR has offered an alternative.
I don't think Cailee and John know what's about to happen, I pray for all of their sweet little hearts, that God will comfort them while we are gone.
exhale.” The circulation of our blood
Open since May 26, 2010 the Pantone Hotel, created by architect Olivier Hannaert and interior designer Michel Pennerman, has 59 affordable rooms each stylishly featuring the Pantone color matching system. Everything in the hotel is “Pantonized.” There are bikes to borrow, chairs to sit on, mugs and plates for dining and blankets to sleep with all painted in bright and cheerful Pantone colors.
Glamarella is having a sale on specific items right now and the sale will continue until the sale items are sold. Perfect time to think of glamming up your spring wardrobe isn't it?
Now Boris's brainwave, is not a new idea, back in 1973, the Water Resources Board, the government agency (now defunct) published a major report that advocated building a whole raft of infrastructure to aid the movement of water, not to mention constructing freshwater storage barrages in the Ouse, Wash and Morecambe Bay, using a network of canals to move water from north to south, extending reservoirs and building new aqueducts, not to mention constructing a series of tunnels to link up river basins to aid the movement of water.
This year, in the spirit of the journal that I've always kept, I'm going to assign myself a project using a particular product.
top - topshop, necklace - topshop, hat - h&m
Amy Winehouse on loop
I love the huge, boxy guitar tone which just explodes out of my headset here, festooned in frivolous, zipping and bloody leads that help counterbalance the lower end ballast of the composition. Structurally, they possess a huge and similar tone to peers like Vader or Behemoth, and by this I mean they tend to drawn upon the earlier influences of groups like Morbid Angel and Deicide with a mix of blasted and grooved elements and an often dual-layered vocal attack which features gutturals and snarls. The primary, growled vocals definitely seem like a mixture of David Vincent and Martin van Drunen, which is quite corpulent and effective above the mixture of death, black and thrash aesthetics in the riffing. I enjoy the band's use of flooded, dissonant melodic passages like you'll hear in "Word Becomes Flesh", and they keep a lot of their tracks reined in well under 3 minutes, so they just burst right into existence, clobber you with some skill and then vanish off into the nether.
This requires some calm analysis, not simple reportage…although to be fair to any commentator at the minute, highly significant events are happening so quickly – and accelerating exponentially – one almost has to report and analyse and project on the go. But do that for too long, and the result is plot-loss.
“Well, I should have been if you hadn’t come in.”
Hebrews 4:12 (KJV): “For the word of God is quick, and powerful, and sharper than any twoedged sword, piercing even to the dividing asunder of soul and spirit, and of the joints and marrow, and is a discerner of the thoughts and intents of the heart.”
When yellow fever first came to Holly Springs in 1870, all who were able fled the town to avoid contamination. Out of a population of 3500, only 1500 were left in the town and 1440 of them contracted the disease.
For those who like statistics, I finished 7329 overall out of 21554, 1882 out of 8966 women, and 1364 out of 4580 in my division. That's not too shabby. :) The volunteers were great, the crowd was ah-maz-ing, and it was a total blast! I would definitely do it again. I have to thank all the friends and neighbors who talked me into running the race. I thought of you all during that 26 miles of heat, and the encouragement from everyone helped keep me going.
What Boys Want by Peter Hautman
Just then our two guys walked in. They were the spitting image of their pictures. Thank God.
in other news, i got some grey and white paisley pillows for the bed yesterday. exciting, no? heh.
handful of chopped corriander leaves
Hanging file folders
Feel free to combine your entry with any other Challenges, but most of all have fun!
We were back in CHEO when my son was three years old. He had a severe case of pneumonia. Two weeks in the hospital, IV's, oxygen masks, blood work, and even more bad news... surgery, to drain fluid from his lung. I never thought I'd live through seeing my son being wheeled away to surgery. I don't know how I survived that day, but somehow, we made it through. After the surgery my son had a chest tube in him for four days. To say this was the biggest nightmare of our lives is an understatement, but again, every day I count my blessings, as again I was face-to-face with other children who were very sick and in CHEO for a much longer time. I was thankful for the care, love and attention we received from the staff at CHEO. My son made a full recovery, and is a perfectly healthy, incredibly smart, six year old.
Zines were underground publications that arose in the late '80s early 90's around the then new word processing technology that allowed for cheap "desktop publishing." It opened a whole new world of publishing possibilities that were previously too expensive using the traditional printing press. This was before there was widespread internet access and it was exciting because suddenly everyone could print anything in their own home! Once the internet exploded in the late 1990's most zines migrated online. But in its brief heyday our Valley was a pioneering area for the zine scene, with lots of music zines coming out of the Northampton punk music culture. There was also a subversive little political zine called The Baystate Objectivist, edited by yours truly, which probably had the largest single audience of any of the Valley zines.
Hallaq attempts to define the meaning of the word, as well as the structure and evolution of the maḍhab in his Introduction to Islamic Law. The word maḍhab, he explains, holds several meaning, all of them interconnected, hinting at the following of an opinion or idea which one chooses to adopt, resulting here in the particular opinion of a jurist. Besides this definition there are three other meanings to define the word. One is as “a principle defining the conceptual juristic boundaries of a set of cases.” That is, what is the criterion for reaching a solution on a case in question. Hallaq uses here the case of misappropriation, that is, forcefully taking something. We are left with the question on how to define when that is. According to Hanbali it involves removing the object from its original place, while it merely needs to be taken hold of according to Hanafi. The definition here, that is “the conceptual juristic boundary” for the case, is defined as having to remove the item taken hold off from its place in the case of Hanbali, while it just have to be taken hold of in the opinion of Hanafi. The second meaning of the word is considering the opinion on the jurist of the highest authority in a certain school, that is, the jurist who has the last word. And the third referring to a group of jurist, of any size, who are loyal to an integral and collective legal doctrine attributed to the founder of a certain school, defined by a set of particular and distinct characteristics, not shared by other schools.
And then there’s Jane. Living above Robert in the boarding house, flirting with him, undressing in front of him, knowing he lusts for her but never allowing him to touch her. Jane, who goes out late at night to buy sexy lingerie for a dead man. Who sits in front of her mirror, laughing hysterically at her own reflection.
Jake turned 11 years old yesterday! I can't believe he's 11! For some reason it seems so much older than 10! He has been wanting an Ipod Touch for about two years but he wasn't ready for one. They are so expensive and we wanted to make sure he would take care of it before we got him one. He needs to pick out a case for it now :) His best buddy Drew came over to play X-Box (pretty much all night!) and they had pizza so he had a good time :) Happy Birthday AVERY Jacob! We love you!
A road trip through Cape York Peninsula should be on your must do list. It’s not easy, or cheap, but you’ll remember it all your days as one of the best things you ever did.
sorting itself in your plastic brain?
The big story of the year, I suppose, was the Condi Veep Rumor™. This blog meticulously tracked this non-story right from the tiny seed of its birth, through several mutations and elaborations, right to its death in the glare of the Palin media blitzkrieg.
It probably also helped our competence that we have hundreds of these wooden boat blanks back at school with which we've been fiddling these last few months. I was reminded that one of my "field trip" ideas had been to make our own wooden boats, release them in the canal that flows under the Fremont Bridge, then attempt to follow their progress as we walk together along the banks.
20 - Delmore Brothers - Gospel Cannonball - 2:33
Yep, Jas has been gone for a month already. so only 11 more to go right??? that's what I have to keep telling myself :) It's been a long month, really chaotic and abnormal for both Ava and I.
Life no longer bothers
Oooohh Betty! Sorry, I just couldn't help myself. Its Mother Day, its The 1970's Diet so I just had to mention Michael Crawford in the classic 1970's sitcom Some Mother's do 'Ave' Em. It was a regular television staple in our house and was watched by millions back in the day where we were limited to 3 (yes you heard right) television stations. The mad cap antics of Frank Spencer were very funny especially the stunts at the end - which he did all himself. Here's a clip to refresh your memory - probably the most popular one "rollerskating". I love the bit on the bus where he says in his famously effeminate voice "I haven't got no change!"
“How do you sell them?” I asked.
No other human being in that office wanted to play with little Ja, for all of them were busy-working adults. This could have bored a kid to death, but I was content in my own little universe—busy playing with worlds inked into life.
23 And the rest of the acts of Joram, and all that he did, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Judah?
The situation seems to be much the same in other parts of the social work realm. Psychiatric social workers must compete against psychiatrists and psychiatric nurses, within medical environments that can feel like foreign turf. Social workers who want to work with couples have to compete against marriage and family therapists and against counseling psych graduates, both of whom tend to get better and more specialized training because their curricula are less burdened with redundant drivel mandated by the CSWE. On the research side, there are social work faculty, teaching at the doctoral level, whose teaching abilities and subject-matter knowledge compare poorly against those of good high school math and science teachers. With prayer, doctoral students taught by these geniuses might someday succeed in proposing and conducting good research. I do believe in miracles. But where my faith fails, it is once again the poor who get screwed, as their putative rainmakers and miracle workers turn out to be frauds.
Frog decided he likes tea parties and came back for seconds on the hot cocoa. We enjoyed watching the snow come down for the rest of the evening and did get a day off from school the next day. This week we've had damage to the school building that prevented frog from attending on Monday, a wind storm (60 mph) that knocked the power out on Wednesday, and lots and lots of rain predicted for the rest of the week - we are so ready for spring to get here!
One of the most important reasons why you shouldn’t wait for your emails to pile up in your inbox is because eventually someday you’re storage will fill up and unless you pay or create a new email account, you’re going to have to delete all those emails. This can take lots of work if you want to make sure you don’t delete any important emails. So unless you’re going to delete all your emails at once, I suggest you should start deleting those emails the moment you don’t need them anymore. If you do this, you wouldn’t have to be like me, wasting your time and going through 2,152 emails individually and deciding which to delete one by one.
Darien Restaurant Week led us to discover a star that’s been shining in Darien since September 1, 2010: Scena Wine Bar & Restaurant. Scena is the brainchild of the same owners of Cava in New Canaan and 55° Wine Bar & Restaurant in Fairfield. When we arrived, we enjoyed Scena’s decor, which had a modern sensibility to it, similar to the food. It’s rooted in real, classic Italian dishes and kinds of flavors, but it’s more than that. The food is deeper, more complex, and is even playful…more on that when we get to the Nutella Filled Crepe.
FunBites are made in the US. The idea started with a picky eater and a Mom who wanted to try something new. Something that would bet her little picky eater to eat (and her to not have to cut fun shapes out of all the food.) With FunBites you just position it on the food and push. It does the cutting for you!
Mike and Cathy Jung own Hastings Prime Meats. It is located on 537 Warburton Avenue in Hastings on Hudson, New York. If you're lucky, they're will be some kimchi in the refrigerated food case when you are in the neighborhood.
18.BEEFEATER "Just Things"
My second thought was that dumbed down education leads to the probable need for this kind of sign.
Lastly, I want to thank all of my readers so much for your support and sweet comments. I hit 300 followers today and feel so lucky to have this outlet and creative talent to share with others. I really appreciate each of you more than you may know, so thank you.
Plus, it was nice to get a whole day of snowboarding in alone with the hubberz, I don't get a lot of time with him like that these days because of Law School :) It was nice, &much needed.
This post does contain spoilers, since it is a book review of The Beyonders: A World Without Heroes, by Brandon Mull.
Roaring across my trail,
I hope you enjoy my baby girl. I love all the little baby embellishments. Don't forget to add you project over at The Robyn's Fetish Challenge Blog. I can't wait to see all the baby projects. Our Wonderful Design Team made terrific baby cards also so don't forget to visit their blogs and leave them a little love. Have fun and I will see you next Sunday. Have a Wonderful Week!!
When I asked for some people to guest post this week, I was pretty excited when a new friend, Christy of Christy Foreman Photography, emailed me to say she'd love to post. I recently "met" Christy online through a mutual photography friend, Amanda of Amanda Buechler Photography and lilian.grace, and I thought it would be great to have someone from a different branch of the arts world share some of her thoughts here. plus, I just love Christy's photos! Here are a few of my recent faves:
We're running all our rest,
Muster of peacocks,
31st May 2012.
Cannot wait for tomorrow's adventure.
The Bun's have now whizzed through all my old copies of Judy, Bunty, Tammy, Mandy and June. Misty has been saved for daytime reading as it's a bit spooky.
THE partner of a man murdered outside his home has been left "completely traumatised" after she watched the attack from a window. William McKeeney, 57, was attacked by two men in Melville Street, in the Pollokshields area of Glasgow, at around 12.40am on Sunday as he walked home from a night out.
Then came the second breach of the cloister: after lunch, my friend said that since the humidity and heat had broken he was heading out to Westwood Marina for an few hours of writing and sipping lemonade by the lake. Did I want to go? Did I want to go???? Yes, I said. But just for two hours. And he couldn't talk to me. No chit-chat. Serious stuff. Agreed.
The Court said “This conduct is said to amount to a misrepresentation of a commercial affiliation between the advertiser and its competitor by displaying the advertiser’s web address in collocation with information concerning the competitor.”
Because it is one of the biggest mental tricks we play on ourselves...The Grass Is Always Greener thing. Instead of just being content, we always think that we Would Be Happier If...or When...but not one of us who walks this earth has the guarantee of tomorrow, so why waste time reserving our happiness for When or If?
I have an idea; while the police are there trying to save the hostages lives, why not cut their wages this month?
UPDATE NEXT MORNING: POSITIVE EVENTS APPEAR TO BE RAPIDLY ACCELERATING
Paladar, in Cuba, is the colloquial Spanish name for a home-based restaurant (especially in Havana) restaurant run "off the radar" of the authorities.
I took my littlest babe to the pediatrician on Wednesday for his 2 month check-up. 2 months already! That sounds so big, like he isn't a teeny tiny baby anymore. Anyways, the pediatrician we seen was an older gentlemen. And by older, I mean older than dirt. He was probably closing in on 80. He gave me lots of outdated advice, like to retract my son's foreskin, to feed my 8 week old cereal, and to drink some wine before bed (in the hopes that it will sedate my wakeful babe). Old people! They are so crazy.
And water very very carefully (no splashing!) I watered my brocolli, caulis, peppers, and squash.My eggplants already look different, and YES I left some tea free to see if there was a difference.
986. Deconstructed Pesto Flatbread @ Earth, Bread, & Brewery (Mount Airy, PA) 7:41
The fallout from Fukushima is starting to snowball. Japan now has to make some decisions, namely whether to restart some of its nuclear plants or to rely more heavily on fossil fuels to cool homes this summer.
Guinsoo: Have they?
So that's my day. I ate pretty normally for me and wasn't feeling any hungrier or ate any more or less than average. The only difference would be that I usually have some nuts or seeds in the afternoon but between the tofu burger and the mmmm sauce, there was already plenty of that type of food added.
1/2 teaspoon ground ginger
And this is one scene
Rouge in Love’s colors appear matte in the tube, but they apply with a silky finish and a slight sheen. Their texture feels like a lip balm and the color has terrific, even coverage. The packaging is a little bit contemporary and a little bit retro: the matte silver cap has a line of red “stitching” running down the back, like the seam of a stocking!
NOW ABOUT THE BAD ACTS OF THE SO CALLED PROFESSIONALS..
who are you, and who’s telling on you? For users of foreign languages, the benchmark is commonly taken to be a “native” standard, but it turns out that even claiming nativeness won’t do: natives also get judged by their primi inter (not so) pares, other natives. If you read Danish, have a look at the Lexiophiles post
Sentiment: There She Goes Stamps (Confidential set), flowers (Fiskars Ink by Steph Skin & Bones collection)
Black pepper, one teaspoon, crushed
That I’m supposed to.
Would not the whole level of our church life become apostolically elevated if God’s people came to the hearing of the word with such an expectancy? Would not our ministers of the Word need to seek the Lord more earnestly for His Word if they knew they were standing before congregations of such a kind? Would we not then all go on from faith to faith and glory to glory? Then could we testify with the Psalmist, “He sent His word and healed them” (Psalm 107:20).
I am quite happy with how this one turned out. The HDR file along with a B&W conversion worked together quite nicely. This also proves that HDR doesn’t have to be vomit of colours as Kai said it is at the beginning of their tutorial (well towards the end, he does admit he is joking and then proceeds to show us proper HDR examples).
I had the pleasure of going to school with some Amazing people , and though most of them stick out when I think of successful individuals, one in particular seems to always catch my attention or simply remind me that dreams are part creativity and mostly determination bundled into a solid formation of what I like to call … Spiritual visionaries . Ashleigh, a high school friend, Graduate from FSU has exemplified what determination and true purity of love and joy can bring forth in life . I’ve watched as she has manifested in so many ways into this beautiful woman, successful student, partnering, spiritual being , and body of creativity. Though we rarely communicate- I keep an eye open and ear to the wind to make make sure I’m aware, most importantly prayers going for all my alum family from Miami Carol City Senior High School.
No ! They are hard-boiled, they are useless, USELESS for most recipes such as fritatas or quiche. I make a killer breakfast burrito -nope, doesn’t translate.
After 10 minutes flip each bagel over so the bottom is now facing up. (When this side begins to get slightly puffy and rounded it is time to boil.)
(2) What we in society want our prisoners to gain whilst in custody is a sense of responsibility. Yet what prison actually does is remove all responsibility from offenders, taking away almost all their power to decide anything, institutionalising them, and in fact infantilising them. Allowing and encouraging prisoners to vote would help a little to mitigate against this negative process, allowing them some autonomy and enabling them to feel like stakeholders in the society we want them to contribute to rather than damaging.
1. Five Year Look-Back
So nothing happened. Well nothing except dealing with my divorce, Donna’s recurring eardrum bursting infections, resulting Grommet implants and slight hearing loss. Oh, and did I mention that I had to move back in with my parents? So nothing happened… while everything else happened.
6. Modern BabyLetto Modo Espresso 3 Drawer Dresser/Changer by DaVinci
I did have a job interview. I threw up in the office. (see aforementioned feeling of illness). I didn't get the job, you could have knocked me over with a feather.
I have featured her before as a mystery lady, and I thought that she actually deserves a mention again, specially as she qualifies as a girl with exceptionally well shaped legs. I think she can be mentioned in the same breath as Ciara, well shaped calves, and loooong legs.
THE SWEETNESS OF SALT by Cecilia Galante
o LAVO, located inside The Palazzo – featuring Revealed Hardwell
Grab some popcorn and get ready. It is going to be quite a show.
This was our absolute favorite. My daughter wanted me to read it to her over and over again, and when she was older she would read it herself. The pictures, illustrated my Lisa McCue are delightful, full of color and oh so cute. In the story a new baby animal is born and the other animals (field mice, raccoons, skunk, bunny, bear, etc.) gather gifts to take to the baby. They bring berries, nuts, fish, even laughter. It isn't until the end that you learn who the new baby animal is.
3) The Guy Fawkes mask, celebrated in the movie V for Vendetta, and becoming a near universal symbol of rebellion, has also been closely associated with the hacking collective known as Anonymous. Both Ad Busters (the Canadian anti-advertisement collective) and Anonymous have been the moving spirit if not direct organizers of the original Occupy Wall Street. The poster artfully uses an old arcade video game metaphor to shout out the relevance of computers to the Occupy movement. The words, Hack The Day, are a reminder of Hacks twofold meaning in both the virtual and wider world. Commonly, a hacker is someone who breaks into or disrupts normal operations—fitting perfectly with a call for a General strike. But perhaps, more importantly, a hack is also a provisional solution to a systemic problem. One thing we’ve seen over and over again at the Occupy sites is the brilliant and provisional nature of their solutions to restrictions imposed by a mostly antagonistic environment. Fittingly, the Wall Street Bull looks as though it is being levitated or is under attack by a Guy Fawkes mask.
5. Have a broomstick lace scarf on the needle for me – but there’s fortunately no rush on that one!
*B.K. Nelson, Inc.
Recently a kind lady from Louisiana mailed me a copy of the "History of the Boers in South Africa," written in 1887 by a Canadian missionary with no political axe to grind: namely George McCall Theal.
Weakness: Long Island has guys that can score so it likes to run and gun, but defense is not a priority. The Blackbirds’ opponents averaging over 77 points per game this season, which is good enough for last place in one of the bottom 10 conferences in Division I basketball. Given the team they’ll be facing in the tournament, that number just won’t be good enough.
Concerns are starting to turn to France as the recession/depression takes hold in Europe. Standard and Poor’s warned last year that France could lose its AAA rating if Europe went into recession. Central banks are looking to debase their currencies as they have attempted everything else. US Economic data has disappointed of late. Jobless Claims are inching higher with revisions to the negative. Is it seasonal? Ray Dalio of Bridgewater Associates warned of a slowdown in 2012. His concern was not so much of the slowdown itself but how does the Fed respond? Are the Fed’s hands tied? Psychological levels are important as confidence is paramount. Hence, The Bernanke Put.
Three guesses and the first two are wrong as to who out of the oil industry, the speculators or the consumer is at the bottom of the hill.
So far, I have also cooked the komatsuna (stir-fry) and plan to make some kind of pasta with the peas (and probably some shrimp). I am a bit at a loss for what to do with the chard though, so if you have a favored chard recipe, please do share!
As someone who works on social media every day, I often wonder if people just read the headlines and don’t click through and read the link. Based on people’s reaction, I usually think they don’t click and read and just react.
Through the years passersby will admire our house for its uniqueness and space, its wooden floors always inviting one to lie down and retire after a tired day, the sliding windows wide and safe enough to sit on its sills while enjoying a shared story. The dining table, long enough to hold a mini feast while the adjoined window faced what used to be a bamboo fence and a star apple tree that had to be chopped down so that a basketball court can be built.
So recently I got a job working for the video game website original-gamer.com writing articles about, well, video games. I don’t know much about video games to start off with, but as I began to learn more I became more and more fascinated with what I’ve seen.
I think GK Chesterton was right, there are aliens amongst us and they have no songs, they ‘hear no music’
Lunch was served and it was outstanding. The cost was $16.50 at the current exchange rate. More than enough food and what a wonderful introduction to traditional South African BBQ. I highly recommend Middelvlei for an authentic meal. No pretenses, no frills, nothing over priced, just good food and good wine.
For years, it’s been hard for me to find the strength in my heart to say “I can do something about this”, and really take charge of my weightloss. I had been beaten down so many times that it just felt like this was the way things were always going to be. It’s caused depression, but I just began to accept it for what it is; I’m fat, and that’s just me.
I've considered changing out the chest carrier for something with a quicker method of removal if I need to. I'm leaning strongly towards the Tactical Tailor MAV or Mini-MAV, based on stellar reports from friends and former associates. I've also been eye-balling a simple Eagle set-up that a friend is currently running. Basically, all it needs to have is real estate for four double-stack rifle magazine pouches.
On our way to Turds Nest was the longest and steepest descent on the mountain. It is normally the path for a double black diamond when skiing. You had no choice but to run and there was no way of stopping yourself unless you decided to fall on your but and slide down a bunch of rocks. This sucked, and, it was in a place everyone on the mountain could see you. But it did lead us to Turds Nest which was an awesome obstacle that was basically a cargo net suspended in the air that you had to strategically cross, a lot of fun.
3. The Best of the Best in Summer Beauty Essentials by WhoWhatWear
There are so many adorable styles out there, I had trouble narrowing down the list. I know of course that more than just the level of formality affects how you chose your dress. Location (both the state/country and venue, time of day and temperature are all factors in your decision. I mean, remember my search for the black tie gown that I wrote about here and here? So what I have for your today is a wide range of options. That way, hopefully no matter when and where the wedding you are attending is, Tartan & Sequins has got you set. Happy shopping :)
ready to take the dark
There you have it–the basic set-up. I am aware that there are distinctions between ‘fast’ and ‘slow’ zombies, but I would contend that the difference is immaterial to the heart of my critique, except to say that ‘fast’ zombies make somewhat less sense (who in such an addled state of mind actually *improves* coordination?) and is somewhat more effective (see below).
24) I tend to be very loyal, but if you have fucked me over, all bets are off.
My motivation for starting this group came after I watched a panel discussion hosted at Fuller and some elements of this discussion were actually found in the WEEKFour talk that I gave (it will be uploaded and available soon).
Something that did survive the flood, was all my research notes, teaching notes and photos on Turkish Embroidery. It had been stored like other things in a box, and recently I needed a large box so took that one and transferred everything ( was to be temporary) into a large plastic bag which was leaning up against something else in the room. The bag was sound and no water seeped in for which I am very grateful.
P.S. The date is Sunday, April 11.
“Then get on top of me next”
